For twelve years, you have been asking: Who is John Galt?  This is
John Galt speaking.  I am the man who loves his life.  I am the man
who does not sacrifice his love or his values.  I am the man who has
deprived you of victims and thus has destroyed your world, and if you
wish to know why you are perishing—you who dread knowledge—I am the
man who will now tell you.”

The chief engineer was the only one able to move; he ran to a
television set and struggled frantically with its dials.  But the
screen remained empty; the speaker had not chosen to be seen.
Only his voice filled the airways of the country—of the world, thought
the chief engineer—sounding as if he were speaking here, in this room,
not to a group, but to one man; it was not the tone of addressing a
meeting, but the tone of addressing a mind.

“You have heard it said that this is an age of moral crisis.  You have
said it yourself, half in fear, half in hope that the words had no meaning.
You have cried that man’s sins are destroying the world and you have
cursed human nature for its unwillingness to practice the virtues you
demanded.  Since virtue, to you, consists of sacrifice, you have
demanded more sacrifices at every successive disaster.  In the name of
a return to morality, you have sacrificed all those evils which you
held as the cause of your plight.  You have sacrificed justice to mercy.
You have sacrificed independence to unity.  You have sacrificed reason
to faith.  You have sacrificed wealth to need.  You have sacrificed
self-esteem to self-denial.  You have sacrificed happiness to duty.

“You have destroyed all that which you held to be evil and achieved
all that which you held to be good.  Why, then, do you shrink in
horror from the sight of the world around you?  That world is not the
product of your sins, it is the product and the image of your virtues.
It is your moral ideal brought into reality in its full and final perfection.
You have fought for it, you have dreamed of it, and you have wished
it, and I—I am the man who has granted you your wish.

“Your ideal had an implacable enemy, which your code of morality was
designed to destroy.  I have withdrawn that enemy.  I have taken it
out of your way and out of your reach.  I have removed the source of
all those evils you were sacrificing one by one.  I have ended your battle.
I have stopped your motor.  I have deprived your world of man’s mind.

“Men do not live by the mind, you say?  I have withdrawn those who do.
The mind is impotent, you say?  I have withdrawn those whose mind isn’t.
There are values higher than the mind, you say?  I have withdrawn those
for whom there aren’t.

“While you were dragging to your sacrificial altars the men of justice,
of independence, of reason, of wealth, of self-esteem—I beat you to it,
I reached them first.  I told them the nature of the game you were
playing and the nature of that moral code of yours, which they had
been too innocently generous to grasp.  I showed them the way to live
by another morality—mine.  It is mine that they chose to follow.

“All the men who have vanished, the men you hated, yet dreaded to lose,
it is I who have taken them away from you.  Do not attempt to find us.
We do not choose to be found.  Do not cry that it is our duty to serve you.
We do not recognize such duty.  Do not cry that you need us.  We do
not consider need a claim.  Do not cry that you own us.  You don’t.
Do not beg us to return.  We are on strike, we, the men of the mind.

“We are on strike against self-immolation.  We are on strike against
the creed of unearned rewards and unrewarded duties.  We are on strike
against the dogma that the pursuit of one’s happiness is evil.  We are
on strike against the doctrine that life is guilt.

“There is a difference between our strike and all those you’ve
practiced for centuries: our strike consists, not of making demands,
but of granting them.  We are evil, according to your morality.
We have chosen not to harm you any longer.  We are useless, according
to your economics.  We have chosen not to exploit you any longer.
We are dangerous and to be shackled, according to your politics.
We have chosen not to endanger you, nor to wear the shackles any longer.
We are only an illusion, according to your philosophy.  We have chosen
not to blind you any longer and have left you free to face reality—
the reality you wanted, the world as you see it now, a world without mind.

“We have granted you everything you demanded of us, we who had always
been the givers, but have only now understood it.  We have no demands
to present to you, no terms to bargain about, no compromise to reach.
You have nothing to offer us.  We do not need you.

“Are you now crying: No, this was not what you wanted?  A mindless
world of ruins was not your goal?  You did not want us to leave you?
You moral cannibals, I know that you’ve always known what it was that
you wanted.  But your game is up, because now we know it, too.

“Through centuries of scourges and disasters, brought about by your
code of morality, you have cried that your code had been broken,
that the scourges were punishment for breaking it, that men were too
weak and too selfish to spill all the blood it required.  You damned man,
you damned existence, you damned this earth, but never dared to
question your code.  Your victims took the blame and struggled on,
with your curses as reward for their martyrdom-while you went on
crying that your code was noble, but human nature was not good enough
to practice it.  And no one rose to ask the question: Good?—by what standard?

“You wanted to know John Galt’s identity.  I am the man who has asked
that question.

“Yes, this is an age of moral crisis.  Yes, you are bearing punishment
for your evil.  But it is not man who is now on trial and it is not human
nature that will take the blame.  It is your moral code that’s through,
this time.  Your moral code has reached its climax, the blind alley at
the end of its course.  And if you wish to go on living, what you now
need is not to return to morality—you who have never known any—
but to discover it.

“You have heard no concepts of morality but the mystical or the social.
You have been taught that morality is a code of behavior imposed on
you by whim, the whim of a supernatural power or the whim of society,
to serve God’s purpose or your neighbor’s welfare, to please an
authority beyond the grave or else next door—but not to serve your
life or pleasure.  Your pleasure, you have been taught, is to be found
in immorality, your interests would best be served by evil, and any
moral code must be designed not for you, but against you, not to
further your life, but to drain it.

“For centuries, the battle of morality was fought between those who
claimed that your life belongs to God and those who claimed that it
belongs to your neighbors—between those who preached that the good is
self-sacrifice for the sake of ghosts in heaven and those who preached
that the good is self-sacrifice for the sake of incompetents on earth.
And no one came to say that your life belongs to you and that the good
is to live it.

“Both sides agreed that morality demands the surrender of your
self-interest and of your mind, that the moral and the practical are
opposites, that morality is not the province of reason, but the
province of faith and force.  Both sides agreed that no rational
morality is possible, that there is no right or wrong in reason—
that in reason there’s no reason to be moral.

“Whatever else they fought about, it was against man’s mind that all
your moralists have stood united.  It was man’s mind that all their
schemes and systems were intended to despoil and destroy.
Now choose to perish or to learn that the anti-mind is the anti-life.

“Man’s mind is his basic tool of survival.  Life is given to him,
survival is not.  His body is given to him, its sustenance is not.
His mind is given to him, its content is not.  To remain alive,
he must act, and before he can act he must know the nature and purpose
of his action.  He cannot obtain his food without a knowledge of food
and of the way to obtain it.  He cannot dig a ditch—or build a cyclotron—
without a knowledge of his aim and of the means to achieve it.
To remain alive, he must think.

“But to think is an act of choice.  The key to what you so recklessly
call ‘human nature,’ the open secret you live with, yet dread to name,
is the fact that man is a being of volitional consciousness.  Reason
does not work automatically; thinking is not a mechanical process;
the connections of logic are not made by instinct.  The function of
your stomach, lungs or heart is automatic; the function of your mind
is not.  In any hour and issue of your life, you are free to think or
to evade that effort.  But you are not free to escape from your nature,
from the fact that reason is your means of survival—so that for you,
who are being human, the question ‘to be or not to be’ is the question
‘to think or not to think.’

“A being of volitional consciousness has no automatic course of
behavior.  He needs a code of values to guide his actions.  ‘Value’ is
that which one acts to gain and keep, ‘virtue’ is the action by which
one gains and keeps it.  ‘Value’ presupposes an answer to the
question: of value to whom and for what?  ‘Value’ presupposes a
standard, a purpose and the necessity of action in the face of an
alternative.  Where there are no alternatives, no values are possible.

“There is only one fundamental alternative in the universe:
existence or non-existence—and it pertains to a single class of entities:
to living organisms.  The existence of inanimate matter is unconditional,
the existence of life is not; it depends on a specific course of action.
Matter is indestructible, it changes its forms, but it cannot cease
to exist.  It is only a living organism that faces a constant alternative:
the issue of life or death.  Life is a process of self-sustaining and
self-generated action.  If an organism fails in that action, it dies;
its chemical elements remain, but its life goes out of existence.
It is only the concept of ‘Life’ that makes the concept of ‘Value’
possible.  It is only to a living entity that things can be good or evil.

“A plant must feed itself in order to live; the sunlight, the water,
the chemicals it needs are the values its nature has set it to pursue;
its life is the standard of value directing its actions.  But a plant
has no choice of action; there are alternatives in the conditions it
encounters, but there is no alternative in its function: it acts
automatically to further its life, it cannot act for its own destruction.

“An animal is equipped for sustaining its life; its senses provide it
with an automatic code of action, an automatic knowledge of what is
good for it or evil.  It has no power to extend its knowledge or to
evade it.  In conditions where its knowledge proves inadequate,
it dies.  But so long as it lives, it acts on its knowledge, with automatic
safety and no power of choice, it is unable to ignore its own good,
unable to decide to choose the evil and act as its own destroyer.

“Man has no automatic code of survival.  His particular distinction
from all other living species is the necessity to act in the face of
alternatives by means of volitional choice.  He has no automatic
knowledge of what is good for him or evil, what values his life
depends on, what course of action it requires.  Are you prattling
about an instinct of self-preservation?  An instinct of self-preservation
is precisely what man does not possess.  An ‘instinct’ is an unerring
and automatic form of knowledge.  A desire is not an instinct.
A desire to live does not give you the knowledge required for living.
And even man’s desire to live is not automatic: your secret evil today
is that that is the desire you do not hold.  Your fear of death is not
a love of life and will not give you the knowledge needed to keep it.
Man must obtain his knowledge and choose his actions by a process
of thinking, which nature will not force him to perform.  Man has the
power to act as his own destroyer—and that is the way he has acted
through most of his history.

“A living entity that regarded its means of survival as evil, would
not survive.  A plant that struggled to mangle its roots, a bird that
fought to break its wings would not remain for long in the existence
they affronted.  But the history of man has been a struggle to deny
and to destroy his mind.

“Man has been called a rational being, but rationality is a matter of choice—
and the alternative his nature offers him is: rational being or suicidal animal.
Man has to be man—by choice; he has to hold his life as a value—
by choice: he has to learn to sustain it—by choice; he has to discover
the values it requires and practice his virtues—by choice.

“A code of values accepted by choice is a code of morality.

“Whoever you are, you who are hearing me now, I am speaking to
whatever living remnant is left uncorrupted within you, to the remnant
of the human, to your mind, and I say: There is a morality of reason,
a morality proper to man, and Man’s Life is its standard of value.

“All that which is proper to the life of a rational being is the good;
all that which destroys it is the evil.

“Man’s life, as required by his nature, is not the life of a mindless brute,
of a looting thug or a mooching mystic, but the life of a thinking being—
not life by means of force or fraud, but life by means of achievement—
not survival at any price, since there’s only one price that pays for
man’s survival: reason.

“Man’s life is the standard of morality, but your own life is its purpose.
If existence on earth is your goal, you must choose your actions and
values by the standard of that which is proper to man—for the purpose
of preserving, fulfilling and enjoying the irreplaceable value which
is your life.

“Since life requires a specific course of action, any other course
will destroy it.  A being who does not hold his own life as the motive
and goal of his actions, is acting on the motive and standard of death.
Such a being is a metaphysical monstrosity, struggling to oppose,
negate and contradict the fact of his own existence, running blindly
amuck on a trail of destruction, capable of nothing but pain.

“Happiness is the successful state of life, pain is an agent of death.
Happiness is that state of consciousness which proceeds from the
achievement of one’s values.  A morality that dares to tell you to
find happiness in the renunciation of your happiness—to value the
failure of your values—is an insolent negation of morality.
A doctrine that gives you, as an ideal, the role of a sacrificial
animal seeking slaughter on the altars of others, is giving you death
as your standard.  By the grace of reality and the nature of life,
man—every man—is an end in himself, he exists for his own sake, and
the achievement of his own happiness is his highest moral purpose.

“But neither life nor happiness can be achieved by the pursuit of
irrational whims.  Just as man is free to attempt to survive in any
random manner, but will perish unless he lives as his nature requires,
so he is free to seek his happiness in any mindless fraud, but the
torture of frustration is all he will find, unless he seeks the happiness
proper to man.  The purpose of morality is to teach you, not to suffer
and die, but to enjoy yourself and live.

“Sweep aside those parasites of subsidized classrooms, who live on the
profits of the mind of others and proclaim that man needs no morality,
no values, no code of behavior.  They, who pose as scientists and
claim that man is only an animal, do not grant him inclusion in the
law of existence they have granted to the lowest of insects.  They
recognize that every living species has a way of survival demanded by
its nature, they do not claim that a fish can live out of water or
that a dog can live without its sense of smell—but man, they claim,
the most complex of beings, man can survive in any way whatever,
man has no identity, no nature, and there’s no practical reason why he
cannot live with his means of survival destroyed, with his mind throttled
and placed at the disposal of any orders they might care to issue.

“Sweep aside those hatred-eaten mystics, who pose as friends of
humanity and preach that the highest virtue man can practice is to
hold his own life as of no value.  Do they tell you that the purpose
of morality is to curb man’s instinct of self-preservation?  It is for
the purpose of self-preservation that man needs a code of morality.
The only man who desires to be moral is the man who desires to live.

“No, you do not have to live; it is your basic act of choice; but if
you choose to live,  you must live as a man—by the work and the
judgment of your mind.

“No, you do not have to live as a man; it is an act of moral choice.
But you cannot live as anything else—and the alternative is that state
of living death which you now see within you and around you, the state
of a thing unfit for existence, no longer human and less than animal,
a thing that knows nothing but pain and drags itself through its span
of years in the agony of unthinking self-destruction.

“No, you do not have to think; it is an act of moral choice.  But someone
had to think to keep you alive; if you choose to default, you default on
existence and you pass the deficit to some moral man, expecting him to
sacrifice his good for the sake of letting you survive by your evil.

“No, you do not have to be a man; but today those who are, are not
there any longer.  I have removed your means of survival—your victims.

“If you wish to know how I have done it and what I told them to make
them quit, you are hearing it now.  I told them, in essence, the statement
I am making tonight.  They were men who had lived by my code,
but had not known how great a virtue it represented.  I made them see it.
I brought them, not a re-evaluation, but only an identification of
their values.

“We, the men of the mind, are now on strike against you in the name of
a single axiom, which is the root of our moral code, just as the root
of yours is the wish to escape it: the axiom that existence exists.

“Existence exists—and the act of grasping that statement implies two
corollary axioms: that something exists which one perceives and that
one exists possessing consciousness, consciousness being the faculty
of perceiving that which exists.

“If nothing exists, there can be no consciousness: a consciousness
with nothing to be conscious of is a contradiction in terms.
A consciousness conscious of nothing but itself is a contradiction
in terms: before it could identify itself as consciousness, it had to
be conscious of something.  If that which you claim to perceive
does not exist, what you possess is not consciousness.

“Whatever the degree of your knowledge, these two—existence and
consciousness—are axioms you cannot escape, these two are the
irreducible primaries implied in any action you undertake, in any part
of your knowledge and in its sum, from the first ray of light you
perceive at the start of your life to the widest erudition you might
acquire at its end.  Whether you know the shape of a pebble or the
structure of a solar system, the axioms remain the same: that it
exists and that you know it.

“To exist is to be something, as distinguished from the nothing of
non-existence, it is to be an entity of a specific nature made of
specific attributes.  Centuries ago, the man who was—no matter what
his error—the greatest of your philosophers, has stated the formula
defining the concept of existence and the rule of all knowledge:
A is A.  A thing is itself.  You have never grasped the meaning of his
statement.  I am here to complete it: Existence is Identity,
Consciousness is Identification.

“Whatever you choose to consider, be it an object, an attribute or an
action, the law of identity remains the same.  A leaf cannot be a stone
at the same time, it cannot be all red and all green at the same time,
it cannot freeze and burn at the same time.  A is A. Or, if you wish
it stated in simpler language: You cannot have your cake and eat it, too.
 
“Are you seeking to know what is wrong with the world?  All the
disasters that have wrecked your world, came from your leaders’
attempt to evade the fact that A is A.  All the secret evil you dread
to face within you and all the pain you have ever endured, came from
your own attempt to evade the fact that A is A.  The purpose of those
who taught you to evade it, was to make you forget that Man is Man.

“Man cannot survive except by gaining knowledge, and reason is his
only means to gain it.  Reason is the faculty that perceives,
identifies and integrates the material provided by his senses.
The task of his senses is to give him the evidence of existence, but
the task of identifying it belongs to his reason, his senses tell him
only that something is, but what it is must be learned by his mind.

“All thinking is a process of identification and integration.
Man perceives a blob of color; by integrating the evidence of his
sight and his touch, he learns to identify it as a solid object;
he learns to identify the object as a table; he learns that the table
is made of wood; he learns that the wood consists of cells, that the
cells consist of molecules, that the molecules consist of atoms.
All through this process, the work of his mind consists of answers to
a single question: What is it?  His means to establish the truth of
his answers is logic, and logic rests on the axiom that existence exists.
Logic is the art of non-contradictory identification.  A contradiction
cannot exist.  An atom is itself, and so is the universe; neither can
contradict its own identity; nor can a part contradict the whole.
No concept man forms is valid unless he integrates it without
contradiction into the total sum of his knowledge.  To arrive at a
contradiction is to confess an error in one’s thinking; to maintain a
contradiction is to abdicate one’s mind and to evict oneself from the
realm of reality.

“Reality is that which exists; the unreal does not exist; the unreal
is merely that negation of existence which is the content of a human
consciousness when it attempts to abandon reason.  Truth is the
recognition of reality; reason, man’s only means of knowledge, is his
only standard of truth.

“The most depraved sentence you can now utter is to ask: Whose reason?
The answer is: Yours.  No matter how vast your knowledge or how
modest, it is your own mind that has to acquire it.  It is only with
your own knowledge that you can deal.  It is only your own knowledge
that you can claim to possess or ask others to consider.  Your mind is
your only judge of truth-and if others dissent from your verdict,
reality is the court of final appeal.  Nothing but a man’s mind can
perform that complex, delicate, crucial process of identification
which is thinking.  Nothing can direct the process but his own judgment.
Nothing can direct his judgment but his moral integrity.

“You who speak of a ‘moral instinct’ as if it were some separate
endowment opposed to reason—man’s reason is his moral faculty.
A process of reason is a process of constant choice in answer to the
question: True or False?—Right or Wrong?  Is a seed to be planted in
soil in order to grow—right or wrong?  Is a man’s wound to be
disinfected in order to save his life—right or wrong?  Does the nature
of atmospheric electricity permit it to be converted into kinetic
power—right or wrong?  It is the answers to such questions that gave
you everything you have—and the answers came from a man’s mind,
a mind of intransigent devotion to that which is right.

“A rational process is a moral process.  You may make an error at any
step of it, with nothing to protect you but your own severity, or you
may try to cheat, to fake the evidence and evade the effort of the quest—
but if devotion to truth is the hallmark of morality, then there is no
greater, nobler, more heroic form of devotion than the act of a man
who assumes the responsibility of thinking.

“That which you call your soul or spirit is your consciousness, and
that which you call ‘free will’ is your mind’s freedom to think or not,
the only will you have, your only freedom, the choice that controls
all the choices you make and determines your life and your character.

“Thinking is man’s only basic virtue, from which all the others
proceed.  And his basic vice, the source of all his evils, is that
nameless act which all of you practice, but struggle never to admit:
the act of blanking out, the willful suspension of one’s consciousness,
the refusal to think—not blindness, but the refusal to see; not ignorance,
but the refusal to know.  It is the act of unfocusing your mind and
inducing an inner fog to escape the responsibility of judgment—
on the unstated premise that a thing will not exist if only you refuse
to identify it, that A will not be A so long as you do not pronounce
the verdict ‘It is.’ Non-thinking is an act of annihilation, a wish to
negate existence, an attempt to wipe out reality.  But existence exists;
reality is not to be wiped out, it will merely wipe out the wiper.
By refusing to say ‘It is,’ you are refusing to say ‘I am.’
By suspending your judgment, you are negating your person.  When a
man declares: ‘Who am I to know?’—he is declaring: ‘Who am I to live?’

“This, in every hour and every issue, is your basic moral choice:
thinking or non-thinking, existence or non-existence, A or non-A,
entity or zero.

“To the extent to which a man is rational, life is the premise
directing his actions.  To the extent to which he is irrational, the
premise directing his actions is death.

“You who prattle that morality is social and that man would need no
morality on a desert island—it is on a desert island that he would
need it most.  Let him try to claim, when there are no victims to pay
for it, that a rock is a house, that sand is clothing, that food will
drop into his mouth without cause or effort, that he will collect a
harvest tomorrow by devouring his stock seed today—and reality will
wipe him out, as he deserves; reality will show him that life is a value
to be bought and that thinking is the only coin noble enough to buy it.

“If I were to speak your kind of language, I would say that man’s only
moral commandment is: Thou shalt think.  But a ‘moral commandment’ is
a contradiction in terms.  The moral is the chosen, not the forced;
the understood, not the obeyed.  The moral is the rational, and reason
accepts no commandments.

“My morality, the morality of reason, is contained in a single axiom:
existence exists—and in a single choice: to live.  The rest proceeds
from these.  To live, man must hold three things as the supreme and
ruling values of his life: Reason—Purpose—Self-esteem.  Reason, as his
only tool of knowledge—Purpose, as his choice of the happiness which
that tool must proceed to achieve—Self-esteem, as his inviolate
certainty that his mind is competent to think and his person is worthy
of happiness, which means: is worthy of living.  These three values
imply and require all of man’s virtues, and all his virtues pertain to
the relation of existence and consciousness: rationality, independence,
integrity, honesty, justice, productiveness, pride.

“Rationality is the recognition of the fact that existence exists,
that nothing can alter the truth and nothing can take precedence over
that act of perceiving it, which is thinking—that the mind is one’s
only judge of values and one’s only guide of action—that reason is an
absolute that permits no compromise—that a concession to the
irrational invalidates one’s consciousness and turns it from the task
of perceiving to the task of faking reality—that the alleged short-cut
to knowledge, which is faith, is only a short-circuit destroying the mind—
that the acceptance of a mystical invention is a wish for the annihilation
of existence and, properly, annihilates one’s consciousness.

“Independence is the recognition of the fact that yours is the
responsibility of judgment and nothing can help you escape it—
that no substitute can do your thinking, as no pinch-hitter can live
your life—that the vilest form of self-abasement and self-destruction
is the subordination of your mind to the mind of another,
the acceptance of an authority over your brain, the acceptance of his
assertions as facts, his say-so as truth, his edicts as middle-man
between your consciousness and your existence.

“Integrity is the recognition of the fact that you cannot fake your
consciousness, just as honesty is the recognition of the fact that you
cannot fake existence—that man is an indivisible entity, an integrated
unit of two attributes: of matter and consciousness, and that he may
permit no breach between body and mind, between action and thought,
between his life and his convictions—that, like a judge impervious to
public opinion, he may not sacrifice his convictions to the wishes of others,
be it the whole of mankind shouting pleas or threats against him—
that courage and confidence are practical necessities, that courage is
the practical form of being true to existence, of being true to one’s
own consciousness.

“Honesty is the recognition of the fact that the unreal is unreal and
can have no value, that neither love nor fame nor cash is a value if
obtained by fraud—that an attempt to gain a value by deceiving the
mind of others is an act of raising your victims to a position higher
than reality, where you become a pawn of their blindness, a slave of
their non-thinking and their evasions, while their intelligence,
their rationality, their perceptiveness become the enemies you have to
dread and flee—that you do not care to live as a dependent, least of
all a dependent on the stupidity of others, or as a fool whose source
of values is the fools he succeeds in fooling—that honesty is not a
social duty, not a sacrifice for the sake of others, but the most
profoundly selfish virtue man can practice: his refusal to sacrifice the
reality of his own existence to the deluded consciousness of others.

“Justice is the recognition of the fact that you cannot fake the
character of men as you cannot fake the character of nature, that you
must judge all men as conscientiously as you judge inanimate objects,
with the same respect for truth, with the same incorruptible vision,
by as pure and as rational a process of identification—that every man
must be judged for what he is and treated accordingly, that just as
you do not pay a higher price for a rusty chunk of scrap than for a
piece of shining metal, so you do not value a totter above a hero—
that your moral appraisal is the coin paying men for their virtues
or vices, and this payment demands of you as scrupulous an honor as
you bring to financial transactions—that to withhold your contempt
from men’s vices is an act of moral counterfeiting, and to withhold
your admiration from their virtues is an act of moral embezzlement—
that to place any other concern higher than justice is to devaluate
your moral currency and defraud the good in favor of the evil,
since only the good can lose by a default of justice and only the evil
can profit—and that the bottom of the pit at the end of that road,
the act of moral bankruptcy, is to punish men for their virtues and
reward them for their vices, that that is the collapse to full depravity,
the Black Mass of the worship of death, the dedication of your
consciousness to the destruction of existence.

“Productiveness is your acceptance of morality, your recognition of
the fact that you choose to live—that productive work is the process
by which man’s consciousness controls his existence, a constant
process of acquiring knowledge and shaping matter to fit one’s purpose,
of translating an idea into physical form, of remaking the earth in
the image of one’s values—that all work is creative work if done by a
thinking mind, and no work is creative if done by a blank who repeats
in uncritical stupor a routine he has learned from others—that your
work is yours to choose, and the choice is as wide as your mind,
that nothing more is possible to you and nothing less is human—
that to cheat your way into a job bigger than your mind can handle is
to become a fear-corroded ape on borrowed motions and borrowed time,
and to settle down into a job that requires less than your mind’s full
capacity is to cut your motor and sentence yourself to another kind
of motion: decay—that your work is the process of achieving your values,
and to lose your ambition for values is to lose your ambition to live—
that your body is a machine, but your mind is its driver, and you must
drive as far as your mind will take you, with achievement as the goal
of your road—that the man who has no purpose is a machine that coasts
downhill at the mercy of any boulder to crash in the first chance ditch,
that the man who stifles his mind is a stalled machine slowly going to rust,
that the man who lets a leader prescribe his course is a wreck being
towed to the scrap heap, and the man who makes another man his goal is
a hitchhiker no driver should ever pick up—that your work is the
purpose of your life, and you must speed past any killer who assumes
the right to stop you, that any value you might find outside your work,
any other loyalty or love, can be only travelers you choose to share
your journey and must be travelers going on their own power in the
same direction.

“Pride is the recognition of the fact that you are your own highest
value and, like all of man’s values, it has to be earned—that of any
achievements open to you, the one that makes all others possible is
the creation of your own character—that your character, your actions,
your desires, your emotions are the products of the premises held by
your mind—that as man must produce the physical values he needs to
sustain his life, so he must acquire the values of character that make
his life worth sustaining—that as man is a being of self-made wealth,
so he is a being of self-made soul—that to live requires a sense of
self-value, but man, who has no automatic values, has no automatic
sense of self-esteem and must earn it by shaping his soul in the image
of his moral ideal, in the image of Man, the rational being he is born
able to create, but must create by choice—that the first precondition
of self-esteem is that radiant selfishness of soul which desires the
best in all things, in values of matter and spirit, a soul that seeks
above all else to achieve its own moral perfection, valuing nothing
higher than itself—and that the proof of an achieved self-esteem is
your soul’s shudder of contempt and rebellion against the role of a
sacrificial animal, against the vile impertinence of any creed that
proposes to immolate the irreplaceable value which is your consciousness
and the incomparable glory which is your existence to the blind
evasions and the stagnant decay of others.

“Are you beginning to see who is John Galt?  I am the man who has
earned the thing you did not fight for, the thing you have renounced,
betrayed, corrupted, yet were unable fully to destroy and are now
hiding as your guilty secret, spending your life in apologies to every
professional cannibal, lest it be discovered that somewhere within you,
you still long to say what I am now saying to the hearing of the whole
of mankind: I am proud of my own value and of the fact that I wish to live.

“This wish—which you share, yet submerge as an evil—is the only remnant
of the good within you, but it is a wish one must learn to deserve.
His own happiness is man’s only moral purpose, but only his own virtue
can achieve it.  Virtue is not an end in itself.  Virtue is not its
own reward or sacrificial fodder for the reward of evil.  Life is the
reward of virtue—and happiness is the goal and the reward of life.

“Just as your body has two fundamental sensations, pleasure and pain,
as signs of its welfare or injury, as a barometer of its basic alternative,
life or death, so your consciousness has two fundamental emotions,
joy and suffering, in answer to the same alternative.  Your emotions
are estimates of that which furthers your life or threatens it,
lightning calculators giving you a sum of your profit or loss.
You have no choice about your capacity to feel that something is good
for you or evil, but what you will consider good or evil, what will
give you joy or pain, what you will love or hate, desire or fear,
depends on your standard of value.  Emotions are inherent in your nature,
but their content is dictated by your mind.  Your emotional capacity
is an empty motor, and your values are the fuel with which your mind
fills it.  If you choose a mix of contradictions, it will clog your motor,
corrode your transmission and wreck you on your first attempt to move
with a machine which you, the driver, have corrupted.

“If you hold the irrational as your standard of value and the impossible
as your concept of the good, if you long for rewards you have not earned,
for a fortune, or a love you don’t deserve, for a loophole in the law
of causality, for an A that becomes non-A at your whim, if you desire
the opposite of existence—you will reach it.  Do not cry, when you reach it,
that life is frustration and that happiness is impossible to man;
check your fuel: it brought you where you wanted to go.

“Happiness is not to be achieved at the command of emotional whims.
Happiness is not the satisfaction of whatever irrational wishes you might
blindly attempt to indulge.  Happiness is a state of non-contradictory joy—
a joy without penalty or guilt, a joy that does not clash with any of
your values and does not work for your own destruction, not the joy of
escaping from your mind, but of using your mind’s fullest power,
not the joy of faking reality, but of achieving values that are real,
not the joy of a drunkard, but of a producer.  Happiness is possible
only to a rational man, the man who desires nothing but rational goals,
seeks nothing but rational values and finds his joy in nothing but
rational actions.

“Just as I support my life, neither by robbery nor alms, but by my own effort,
so I do not seek to derive my happiness from the injury or the favor of others,
but earn it by my own achievement.  Just as I do not consider the pleasure
of others as the goal of my life, so I do not consider my pleasure as
the goal of the lives of others.  Just as there are no contradictions
in my values and no conflicts among my desires—so there are no victims
and no conflicts of interest among rational men, men who do not desire
the unearned and do not view one another with a cannibal’s lust,
men who neither make sacrifice nor accept them.

“The symbol of all relationships among such men, the moral symbol of
respect for human beings, is the trader.  We, who live by values,
not by loot, are traders, both in matter and in spirit.  A trader is a man
who earns what he gets and does not give or take the undeserved.
A trader does not ask to be paid for his failures, nor does he ask to
be loved for his flaws.  A trader does not squander his body as fodder
or his soul as alms.  Just as he does not give his work except in trade
for material values, so he does not give the values of his spirit—
his love, his friendship, his esteem—except in payment and in trade
for human virtues, in payment for his own selfish pleasure, which he
receives from men he can respect.  The mystic parasites who have,
throughout the ages, reviled the traders and held them in contempt,
while honoring the beggars and the looters, have known the secret
motive of their sneers: a trader is the entity they dread—a man of justice.

“Do you ask what moral obligation I owe to my fellow men?  None—
except the obligation I owe to myself, to material objects and to all
of existence: rationality.  I deal with men as my nature and their demands:
by means of reason.  I seek or desire nothing from them except such
relations as they care to enter of their own voluntary choice.  It is
only with their mind that I can deal and only for my own self-interest,
when they see that my interest coincides with theirs.  When they don’t,
I enter no relationship; I let dissenters go their way and I do not swerve
from mine.  I win by means of nothing but logic and I surrender to
nothing but logic.  I do not surrender my reason or deal with men who
surrender theirs.  I have nothing to gain from fools or cowards;
I have no benefits to seek from human vices: from stupidity,
dishonesty or fear.  The only value men can offer me is the work of
their mind.  When I disagree with a rational man, I let reality be our
final arbiter; if I am right, he will learn; if I am wrong, I will;
one of us will win, but both will profit.

“Whatever may be open to disagreement, there is one act of evil that
may not, the act that no man may commit against others and no man may
sanction or forgive.  So long as men desire to live together, no man
may initiate—do you hear me?  no man may start—the use of physical
force against others.

“To interpose the threat of physical destruction between a man and his
perception of reality, is to negate and paralyze his means of
survival; to force him to act against his own judgment, is like
forcing him to act against his own sight.  Whoever, to whatever
purpose or extent, initiates the use of force, is a killer acting on
the premise of death in a manner wider than murder: the premise of
destroying man’s capacity to live.

“Do not open your mouth to tell me that your mind has convinced you of
your right to force my mind.  Force and mind are opposites; morality
ends where a gun begins.  When you declare that men are irrational
animals and propose to treat them as such, you define thereby your own
character and can no longer claim the sanction of reason—as no
advocate of contradictions can claim it.  There can be no ‘right’ to
destroy the source of rights, the only means of judging right and wrong:
the mind.

“To force a man to drop his own mind and to accept your will as a
substitute, with a gun in place of a syllogism, with terror in place
of proof, and death as the final argument—is to attempt to exist in
defiance of reality.  Reality demands of man that he act for his own
rational interest; your gun demands of him that he act against it.
Reality threatens man with death if he does not act on his rational
judgment: you threaten him with death if he does.  You place him into
a world where the price of his life is the surrender of all the virtues
required by life—and death by a process of gradual destruction is all
that you and your system will achieve, when death is made to be the
ruling power, the winning argument in a society of men.

“Be it a highwayman who confronts a traveler with the ultimatum: ‘Your
money or your life,’ or a politician who confronts a country with the
ultimatum: ‘Your children’s education or your life,’ the meaning of
that ultimatum is: ‘Your mind or your life’—and neither is possible to
man without the other.

“If there are degrees of evil, it is hard to say who is the more contemptible:
the brute who assumes the right to force the mind of others or the
moral degenerate who grants to others the right to force his mind.
That is the moral absolute one does not leave open to debate.
I do not grant the terms of reason to men who propose to deprive me of reason.
I do not enter discussions with neighbors who think they can forbid me to think.
I do not place my moral sanction upon a murderer’s wish to kill me.
When a man attempts to deal with me by force, I answer him—by force.

“It is only as retaliation that force may be used and only against the
man who starts its use.  No, I do not share his evil or sink to his
concept of morality: I merely grant him his choice, destruction, the
only destruction he had the right to choose: his own.  He uses force
to seize a value; I use it only to destroy destruction.  A holdup man
seeks to gain wealth by killing me; I do not grow richer by killing a
holdup man.  I seek no values by means of evil, nor do I surrender my
values to evil.

“In the name of all the producers who had kept you alive and received
your death ultimatums in payment, I now answer you with a single
ultimatum of our own: Our work or your guns.  You can choose either;
you can’t have both.  We do not initiate the use of force against
others or submit to force at their hands.  If you desire ever again
to live in an industrial society, it will be on our moral terms. 
Our terms and our motive power are the antithesis of yours.
You have been using fear as your weapon and have been bringing death
to man as his punishment for rejecting your morality.  We offer him
life as his reward for accepting ours.

“You who are worshippers of the zero—you have never discovered that
achieving life is not the equivalent of avoiding death.  Joy is not
‘the absence of pain,’ intelligence is not ‘the absence of stupidity,’
light is not ‘the absence of darkness,’ an entity is not ‘the absence
of a nonentity.’ Building is not done by abstaining from demolition;
centuries of sitting and waiting in such abstinence will not raise one
single girder for you to abstain from demolishing—and now you can no
longer say to me, the builder: ‘Produce, and feed us in exchange for
our not destroying your production.’ I am answering in the name of all
your victims: Perish with and in your own void.  Existence is not a
negation of negatives.  Evil, not value, is an absence and a negation,
evil is impotent and has no power but that which we let it extort from us.
Perish, because we have learned that a zero cannot hold a mortgage
over life.

“You seek escape from pain.  We seek the achievement of happiness.
You exist for the sake of avoiding punishment.  We exist for the sake
of earning rewards.  Threats will not make us function; fear is not
our incentive.  It is not death that we wish to avoid, but life that
we wish to live.

“You, who have lost the concept of the difference, you who claim that
fear and joy are incentives of equal power—and secretly add that fear
is the more ‘practical’—you do not wish to live, and only fear of
death still holds you to the existence you have damned.  You dart in
panic through the trap of your days, looking for the exit you have closed,
running from a pursuer you dare not name to a terror you dare not
acknowledge, and the greater your terror the greater your dread of the
only act that could save you: thinking.  The purpose of your struggle
is not to know, not to grasp or name or hear the thing.  I shall now
state to your hearing: that yours is the Morality of Death.

“Death is the standard of your values, death is your chosen goal,
and you have to keep running, since there is no escape from the
pursuer who is out to destroy you or from the knowledge that that
pursuer is yourself.  Stop running, for once—there is no place to run—
stand naked, as you dread to stand, but as I see you, and take a look
at what you dared to call a moral code.

“Damnation is the start of your morality, destruction is its purpose,
means and end.  Your code begins by damning man as evil, then demands
that he practice a good which it defines as impossible for him to practice.
It demands, as his first proof of virtue, that he accept his own depravity
without proof.  It demands that he start, not with a standard of
value, but with a standard of evil, which is himself, by means of
which he is then to define the good: the good is that which he is not.

“It does not matter who then becomes the profiteer on his renounced
glory and tormented soul, a mystic God with some incomprehensible
design or any passer-by whose rotting sores are held as some
inexplicable claim upon him—it does not matter, the good is not for
him to understand, his duty is to crawl through years of penance,
atoning for the guilt of his existence to any stray collector of
unintelligible debts, his only concept of a value is a zero: the good
is that which is non-man.

“The name of this monstrous absurdity is Original Sin.

“A sin without volition is a slap at morality and an insolent
contradiction in terms: that which is outside the possibility of
choice is outside the province of morality.  If man is evil by birth,
he has no will, no power to change it; if he has no will, he can be
neither good nor evil; a robot is amoral.  To hold, as man’s sin, a
fact not open to his choice is a mockery of morality.  To hold man’s
nature as his sin is a mockery of nature.  To punish him for a crime
he committed before he was born is a mockery of justice.  To hold him
guilty in a matter where no innocence exists is a mockery of reason.
To destroy morality, nature, justice and reason by means of a single
concept is a feat of evil hardly to be matched.  Yet that is the root
of your code.

“Do not hide behind the cowardly evasion that man is born with free will,
but with a ‘tendency’ to evil.  A free will saddled with a tendency is
like a game with loaded dice.  It forces man to struggle through the
effort of playing, to bear responsibility and pay for the game, but the
decision is weighted in favor of a tendency that he had no power to escape.
If the tendency is of his choice, he cannot possess it at birth;
if it is not of his choice, his will is not free.

“What is the nature of the guilt that your teachers call his Original Sin?
What are the evils man acquired when he fell from a state they
consider perfection?  Their myth declares that he ate the fruit of the
tree of knowledge—he acquired a mind and became a rational being.
It was the knowledge of good and evil—he became a mortal being.
He was sentenced to earn his bread by his labor—he became a
productive being.  He was sentenced to experience desire—he acquired
the capacity of sexual enjoyment.  The evils for which they damn him
are reason, morality, creativeness, joy—all the cardinal values of
his existence.  It is not his vices that their myth of man’s fall is
designed to explain and condemn, it is not his errors that they hold
as his guilt, but the essence of his nature as man.  Whatever he was—
that robot in the Garden of Eden, who existed without mind,
without values, without labor, without love—he was not man.

“Man’s fall, according to your teachers, was that he gained the
virtues required to live.  These virtues, by their standard, are his Sin.
His evil, they charge, is that he’s man.  His guilt, they charge,
is that he lives.

“They call it a morality of mercy and a doctrine of love for man.
No, they say, they do not preach that man is evil, the evil is only
that alien object: his body.  No, they say, they do not wish to kill him,
they only wish to make him lose his body.  They seek to help him,
they say, against his pain—and they point at the torture rack to which
they’ve tied him, the rack with two wheels that pull him in opposite
directions, the rack of the doctrine that splits his soul and body.

“They have cut man in two, setting one half against the other.
They have taught him that his body and his consciousness are two
enemies engaged in deadly conflict, two antagonists of opposite
natures, contradictory claims, incompatible needs, that to benefit one
is to injure the other, that his soul belongs to a supernatural realm,
but his body is an evil prison holding it in bondage to this earth—
and that the good is to defeat his body, to undermine it by years of
patient struggle, digging his way to that gorgeous jail-break which
leads into the freedom of the grave.

“They have taught man that he is a hopeless misfit made of two
elements, both symbols of death.  A body without a soul is a corpse,
a soul without a body is a ghost-yet such is their image of man’s nature:
the battleground of a struggle between a corpse and a ghost, a corpse
endowed with some evil volition of its own and a ghost endowed with
the knowledge that everything known to man is nonexistent, that only
the unknowable exists.

“Do you observe what human faculty that doctrine was designed to
ignore?  It was man’s mind that had to be negated in order to make him
fall apart.  Once he surrendered reason, he was left at the mercy of
two monsters whom he could not fathom or control: of a body moved by
unaccountable instincts and of a soul moved by mystic revelations—
he was left as the passively ravaged victim of a battle between a robot
and a dictaphone.

“And as he now crawls through the wreckage, groping blindly for a way
to live, your teachers offer him the help of a morality that proclaims
that he’ll find no solution and must seek no fulfillment on earth.
Real existence, they tell him, is that which he cannot perceive,
true consciousness is the faculty of perceiving the non-existent—
and if he is unable to understand it, that is the proof that his
existence is evil and his consciousness impotent.

“As products of the split between man’s soul and body, there are two
kinds of teachers of the Morality of Death: the mystics of spirit and
the mystics of muscle, whom you call the spiritualists and the materialists,
those who believe in consciousness without existence and those who
believe in existence without consciousness.  Both demand the surrender
of your mind, one to their revelation, the other to their reflexes.
No matter how loudly they posture in the roles of irreconcilable antagonists,
their moral codes are alike, and so are their aims: in matter—
the enslavement of man’s body, in spirit—the destruction of his mind.

“The good, say the mystics of spirit, is God, a being whose only
definition is that he is beyond man’s power to conceive—a definition
that invalidates man’s consciousness and nullifies his concepts of
existence.  The good, say the mystics of muscle, is Society—a thing
which they define as an organism that possesses no physical form,
a super-being embodied in no one in particular and everyone in general
except yourself.  Man’s mind, say the mystics of spirit, must be
subordinated to the will of God.  Man’s mind, say the mystics of
muscle, must be subordinated to the will of Society.  Man’s standard
of value, say the mystics of spirit, is the pleasure of God, whose
standards are beyond man’s power of comprehension and must be
accepted on faith.  Man’s standard of value, say the mystics of
muscle, is the pleasure of Society, whose standards are beyond man’s
right of judgment and must be obeyed as a primary absolute.
The purpose of man’s life, say both, is to become an abject zombie who
serves a purpose he does not know, for reasons he is not to question.
His reward, say the mystics of spirit, will be given to him beyond the
grave.  His reward, say the mystics of muscle, will be given on
earth—to his great-grandchildren.

“Selfishness—say both—is man’s evil.  Man’s good—say both—is to give
up his personal desires, to deny himself, renounce himself, surrender;
man’s good is to negate the life he lives.  Sacrifice—cry both—is the
essence of morality, the highest virtue within man’s reach.

“Whoever is now within reach of my voice, whoever is man the victim,
not man the killer, I am speaking at the deathbed of your mind, at the
brink of that darkness in which you’re drowning, and if there still
remains within you the power to struggle to hold on to those fading
sparks which had been yourself—use it now.  The word that has
destroyed you is ‘sacrifice.’ Use the last of your strength to
understand its meaning.  You’re still alive.  You have a chance.

“‘Sacrifice’ does not mean the rejection of the worthless, but of
the precious.  ‘Sacrifice’ does not mean the rejection of the evil for
the sake of the good, but of the good for the sake of the evil.
‘Sacrifice’ is the surrender of that which you value in favor of that
which you don’t.

“If you exchange a penny for a dollar, it is not a sacrifice; if you
exchange a dollar for a penny, it is.  If you achieve the career you
wanted, after years of struggle, it is not a sacrifice; if you then
renounce it for the sake of a rival, it is.  If you own a bottle of
milk and gave it to your starving child, it is not a sacrifice; if you
give it to your neighbor’s child and let your own die, it is.

“If you give money to help a friend, it is not a sacrifice; if you
give it to a worthless stranger, it is.  If you give your friend a sum
you can afford, it is not a sacrifice; if you give him money at the
cost of your own discomfort, it is only a partial virtue, according to
this sort of moral standard; if you give him money at the cost of
disaster to yourself, that is the virtue of sacrifice in full.

“If you renounce all personal desire and dedicate your life to those
you love, you do not achieve full virtue: you still retain a value of
your own, which is your love.  If you devote your life to random
strangers, it is an act of greater virtue.  If you devote your life to
serving men you hate—that is the greatest of the virtues you can
practice.

“A sacrifice is the surrender of a value.  Full sacrifice is full
surrender of all values.  If you wish to achieve full virtue, you must
seek no gratitude in return for your sacrifice, no praise, no love,
no admiration, no self-esteem, not even the pride of being virtuous;
the faintest trace of any gain dilutes your virtue.  If you pursue a
course of action that does not taint your life by any joy, that brings
you no value in matter, no value in spirit, no gain, no profit, no reward—
if you achieve this state of total zero, you have achieved the ideal
of moral perfection.

“You are told that moral perfection is impossible to man—
and, by this standard, it is.  You cannot achieve it so long as you live,
but the value of your life and of your person is gauged by how closely
you succeed in approaching that ideal zero which is death.

“If you start, however, as a passionless blank, as a vegetable seeking
to be eaten, with no values to reject and no wishes to renounce, you
will not win the crown of sacrifice.  It is not a sacrifice to renounce
the unwanted.  It is not a sacrifice.  It is not a sacrifice to give
your life for others, if death is your personal desire.  To achieve
the virtue of sacrifice, you must want to live, you must love it,
you must burn with passion for this earth and for all the splendor it
can give you—you must feel the twist of every knife as it slashes your
desires away from your reach and drains your love out of your body.
It is not mere death that the morality of sacrifice holds out to you
as an ideal, but death by slow torture.

“Do not remind me that it pertains only to this life on earth.  I am
concerned with no other.  Neither are you.

“If you wish to save the last of your dignity, do not call your best
actions a ‘sacrifice’: that term brands you as immoral.  If a mother
buys food for her hungry child rather than a hat for herself, it is
not a sacrifice: she values the child higher than the hat; but it is a
sacrifice to the kind of mother whose higher value is the hat,
who would prefer her child to starve and feeds him only from a sense
of duty.  If a man dies fighting for his own freedom, it is not a sacrifice:
he is not willing to live as a slave; but it is a sacrifice to the kind
of man who’s willing.  If a man refuses to sell his convictions,
it is not a sacrifice, unless he is the sort of man who has no convictions.

“Sacrifice could be proper only for those who have nothing to sacrifice—
no values, no standards, no judgment—those whose desires are
irrational whims, blindly conceived and lightly surrendered.
For a man of moral stature, whose desires are born of rational values,
sacrifice is the surrender of the right to the wrong, of the good to the evil.

“The creed of sacrifice is a morality for the immoral—a morality that
declares its own bankruptcy by confessing that it can’t impart to men
any personal stake in virtues or value, and that their souls are
sewers of depravity, which they must be taught to sacrifice.  By his
own confession, it is impotent to teach men to be good and can only
subject them to constant punishment.

“Are you thinking, in some foggy stupor, that it’s only material
values that your morality requires you to sacrifice?  And what do you
think are material values?  Matter has no value except as a means for
the satisfaction of human desires.  Matter is only a tool of human values.
To what service are you asked to give the material tools your virtue
has produced?  To the service of that which you regard as evil:
to a principle you do not share, to a person you do not respect, to
the achievement of a purpose opposed to your own—else your gift is not
a sacrifice.

“Your morality tells you to renounce the material world and to divorce
your values from matter.  A man whose values are given no expression
in material form, whose existence is unrelated to his ideals, whose
actions contradict his convictions, is a cheap little hypocrite—
yet that is the man who obeys your morality and divorces his values
from matter.  The man who loves one woman, but sleeps with another—
the man who admires the talent of a worker, but hires another—
the man who considers one cause to be just, but donates his money to
the support of another—the man who holds high standards of
craftsmanship, but devotes his effort to the production of trash—
these are the men who have renounced matter, the men who believe that
the values of their spirit cannot be brought into material reality.

“Do you say it is the spirit that such men have renounced?
Yes, of course.  You cannot have one without the other.  You are an
indivisible entity of matter and consciousness.  Renounce your
consciousness and you become a brute.  Renounce your body and you
become a fake.  Renounce the material world and you surrender it to evil.

“And that is precisely the goal of your morality, the duty that your
code demands of you.  Give to that which you do not enjoy, serve that
which you do not admire, submit to that which you consider evil—
surrender the world to the values of others, deny, reject, renounce
your self.  Your self is your mind; renounce it and you become a chunk
of meat ready for any cannibal to swallow.

“It is your mind that they want you to surrender—all those who preach
the creed of sacrifice, whatever their tags or their motives, whether
they demand it for the sake of your soul or of your body, whether they
promise you another life in heaven or a full stomach on this earth.
Those who start by saying: ‘It is selfish to pursue your own wishes,
you must sacrifice them to the wishes of others’—end up by saying: ‘It
is selfish to uphold your convictions, you must sacrifice them to the
convictions of others.

“This much is true: the most selfish of all things is the independent
mind that recognizes no authority higher than its own and no value
higher than its judgment of truth.  You are asked to sacrifice your
intellectual integrity, your logic, your reason, your standard of truth—
in favor of becoming a prostitute whose standard is the greatest good
for the greatest number.

“If you search your code for guidance, for an answer to the question:
‘What is the good?’—the only answer you will find is ‘The good of others.’
The good is whatever others wish, whatever you feel they feel
they wish, or whatever you feel they ought to feel.  ‘The good of others’
is a magic formula that transforms anything into gold, a formula to be
recited as a guarantee of moral glory and as a fumigator for any action,
even the slaughter of a continent.  Your standard of virtue is not an
object, not an act, not a principle, but an intention.  You need no proof,
no reasons, no success, you need not achieve in fact the good of others—
all you need to know is that your motive was the good of others,
not your own.  Your only definition of the good is a negation:
the good is the ‘non-good for me.’

“Your code—which boasts that it upholds eternal, absolute, objective
moral values and scorns the conditional, the relative and the
subjective—your code hands out, as its version of the absolute,
the following rule of moral conduct: If you wish it, it’s evil;
if others wish it, it’s good; if the motive of your action is your
welfare, don’t do it; if the motive is the welfare of others,
then anything goes.

“As this double-jointed, double-standard morality splits you in half,
so it splits mankind into two enemy camps: one is you, the other is
all the rest of humanity.  You are the only outcast who has no right
to wish to live.  You are the only servant, the rest are the masters,
you are the only giver, the rest are the takers, you are the eternal
debtor, the rest are the creditors never to be paid off.  You must not
question their right to your sacrifice, or the nature of their wishes
and their needs: their right is conferred upon them by a negative,
by the fact that they are ‘non-you.’

“For those of you who might ask questions, your code provides a
consolation prize and booby-trap: it is for your own happiness,
it says, that you must serve the happiness of others, the only way to
achieve your joy is to give it up to others, the only way to achieve
your prosperity is to surrender your wealth to others, the only way to
protect your life is to protect all men except yourself—and if you
find no joy in this procedure, it is your own fault and the proof of
your evil; if you were good, you would find your happiness in
providing a banquet for others, and your dignity in existing on such
crumbs as they might care to toss you.

“You who have no standard of self-esteem, accept the guilt and dare
not ask the questions.  But you know the unadmitted answer, refusing
to acknowledge what you see, what hidden premise moves your world.
You know it, not in honest statement, but as a dark uneasiness within you,
while you flounder between guilty cheating and grudgingly practicing a
principle too vicious to name.

“I, who do not accept the unearned, neither in values nor in guilt,
am here to ask the questions you evaded.  Why is it moral to serve the
happiness of others, but not your own?  If enjoyment is a value,
why is it moral when experienced by others, but immoral when
experienced by you?  If the sensation of eating a cake is a value,
why is it an immoral indulgence in your stomach, but a moral goal for
you to achieve in the stomach of others?  Why is it immoral for you
to desire, but moral for others to do so?  Why is it immoral to
produce a value and keep it, but moral to give it away?  And if it is
not moral for you to keep a value, why is it moral for others to
accept it?  If you are selfless and virtuous when you give it,
are they not selfish and vicious when they take it?  Does virtue
consist of serving vice?  Is the moral purpose of those who are good,
self-immolation for the sake of those who are evil?

“The answer you evade, the monstrous answer is: No, the takers are
not evil, provided they did not earn the value you gave them.  It is not
immoral for them to accept it, provided they are unable to produce it,
unable to deserve it, unable to give you any value in return.  It is not
immoral for them to enjoy it, provided they do not obtain it by right.

“Such is the secret core of your creed, the other half of your double
standard: it is immoral to live by your own effort, but moral to live
by the effort of others—it is immoral to consume your own product,
but moral to consume the products of others—it is immoral to earn,
but moral to mooch—it is the parasites who are the moral justification
for the existence of the producers, but the existence of the parasites
is an end in itself—it is evil to profit by achievement, but good to
profit by sacrifice—it is evil to create your own happiness, but good
to enjoy it at the price of the blood of others.

“Your code divides mankind into two castes and commands them to live
by opposite rules: those who may desire anything and those who may
desire nothing, the chosen and the demand, the riders and the carriers,
the eaters and the eaten.  What standard determines your caste?
What passkey admits you to the moral elite?  The passkey is lack of value.

“Whatever the value involved, it is your lack of it that gives you a
claim upon those who don’t lack it.  It is your need that gives you a
claim to rewards.  If you are able to satisfy your need, your ability
annuls your right to satisfy it.  But a need you are unable to satisfy
gives you first right to the lives of mankind.

“If you succeed, any man who fails is your master; if you fail,
any man who succeeds is your serf.  Whether your failure is just or not,
whether your wishes are rational or not, whether your misfortune is
undeserved or the result of your vices, it is misfortune that gives
you a right to rewards.  It is pain, regardless of its nature or cause,
pain as a primary absolute, that gives you a mortgage on all of existence.

“If you heal your pain by your own effort, you receive no moral credit:
your code regards it scornfully as an act of self-interest.
Whatever value you seek to acquire, be it wealth or food or love or rights,
if you acquire it by means of your virtue, your code does not regard it
as a moral acquisition: you occasion no loss to anyone, it is a trade,
not alms; a payment, not a sacrifice.  The deserved belongs in the selfish,
commercial realm of mutual profit; it is only the undeserved that
calls for that moral transaction which consists of profit to one at
the price of disaster to the other.  To demand rewards for your virtue
is selfish and immoral; it is your lack of virtue that transforms your
demand into a moral right.

“A morality that holds need as a claim, holds emptiness—
non-existence—as its standard of value; it rewards an absence,
a defeat: weakness, inability, incompetence, suffering, disease,
disaster, the lack, the fault, the flaw—the zero.

“Who provides the account to pay these claims?  Those who are cursed
for being non-zeros, each to the extent of his distance from that ideal.
Since all values are the product of virtues, the degree of your virtue
is used as the measure of your penalty; the degree of your faults is
used as the measure of your gain.  Your code declares that the rational
man must sacrifice himself to the irrational, the independent man to
parasites, the honest man to the dishonest, the man of justice to the
unjust, the productive man to thieving loafers, the man of integrity to
compromising knaves, the man of self-esteem to sniveling neurotics.
Do you wonder at the meanness of soul in those you see around you?
The man who achieves these virtues will not accept your moral code;
the man who accepts your moral code will not achieve these virtues.

“Under a morality of sacrifice, the first value you sacrifice is morality;
the next is self-esteem.  When need is the standard, every man is both
victim and parasite.  As a victim, he must labor to fill the needs of others,
leaving himself in the position of a parasite whose needs must be
filled by others.  He cannot approach his fellow men except in one of
two disgraceful roles: he is both a beggar and a sucker.

“You fear the man who has a dollar less than you, that dollar is
rightfully his, he makes you feel like a moral defrauder.  You hate
the man who has a dollar more than you, that dollar is rightfully yours,
he makes you feel that you are morally defrauded.  The man below is a
source of your guilt, the man above is a source of your frustration.
You do not know what to surrender or demand, when to give and
when to grab, what pleasure in life is rightfully yours and what debt
is still unpaid to others—you struggle to evade, as ‘theory,’ the knowledge
that by the moral standard you’ve accepted you are guilty every moment
of your life, there is no mouthful of food you swallow that is not
needed by someone somewhere on earth—and you give up the problem in
blind resentment, you conclude that moral perfection is not to be
achieved or desired, that you will muddle through by snatching as
snatch can and by avoiding the eyes of the young, of those who look at
you as if self-esteem were possible and they expected you to have it.
Guilt is all that you retain within your soul—and so does every other man,
as he goes past, avoiding your eyes.  Do you wonder why your morality
has not achieved brotherhood on earth or the good will of man to man?

“The justification of sacrifice, that your morality propounds, is more
corrupt than the corruption it purports to justify.  The motive of
your sacrifice, it tells you, should be love—the love you ought to
feel for every man.  A morality that professes the belief that the
values of the spirit are more precious than matter, a morality that
teaches you to scorn a whore who gives her body indiscriminately to
all men—this same morality demands that you surrender your soul to
promiscuous love for all comers.

“As there can be no causeless wealth, so there can be no causeless
love or any sort of causeless emotion.  An emotion is a response to a
face of reality, an estimate dictated by your standards.  To love is to value.
The man who tells you that it is possible to value without values,
to love those whom you appraise as worthless, is the man who tells you
that it is possible to grow rich by consuming without producing and
that paper money is as valuable as gold.

“Observe that he does not expect you to feel a causeless fear.
When his kind get into power, they are expert at contriving means
of terror, at giving you ample cause to feel the fear by which they
desire to rule you.  But when it comes to love, the highest of emotions,
you permit them to shriek at you accusingly that you are a moral
delinquent if you’re incapable of feeling causeless love.  When a man
feels fear without reason, you call him to the attention of a psychiatrist;
you are not so careful to protect the meaning, the nature and the
dignity of love.

“Love is the expression of one’s values, the greatest reward you can earn
for the moral qualities you have achieved in your character and person,
the emotional price paid by one man for the joy he receives from the
virtues of another.  Your morality demands that you divorce your love
from values and hand it down to any vagrant, not as response to his worth,
but as response to his need, not as reward, but as alms, not as a
payment for virtues, but as a blank check on vices.  Your morality
tells you that the purpose of love is to set you free of the bonds of morality,
that love is superior to moral judgment, that true love transcends,
forgives and survives every manner of evil in its object, and the
greater the love the greater the depravity it permits to the loved.
To love a man for his virtues is paltry and human, it tells you;
to love him for his flaws is divine.  To love those who are worthy of
it is self-interest; to love the unworthy is sacrifice.  You owe your
love to those who don’t deserve it, and the less they deserve it, the
more love you owe them—the more loathsome the object, the nobler
your love—the more unfastidious your love, the greater the virtue—
and if you can bring your soul to the state of a dump heap that
welcomes anything on equal terms, if you can cease to value moral
values, you have achieved the state of moral perfection.

“Such is your morality of sacrifice and such are the twin ideals it offers:
to refashion the life of your body in the image of a human stockyard,
and the life of your spirit in the image of a dump.

“Such was your goal—and you’ve reached it.  Why do you now moan
complaints about man’s impotence and the futility of human aspirations?
Because you were unable to prosper by seeking destruction?
Because you were unable to find joy by worshipping pain?
Because you were unable to live by holding death as your standard of value?

“The degree of your ability to live was the degree to which you broke
your moral code, yet you believe that those who preach it are friends
of humanity, you damn yourself and dare not question their motives or
their goals.  Take a look at them now, when you face your last choice—
and if you choose to perish, do so with full knowledge of how cheaply
so small an enemy has claimed your life.

“The mystics of both schools, who preach the creed of sacrifice,
are germs that attack you through a single sore: your fear of relying
on your mind.  They tell you that they possess a means of knowledge
higher than the mind, a mode of consciousness superior to reason—
like a special pull with some bureaucrat of the universe who gives
them secret tips withheld from others.  The mystics of spirit declare
that they possess an extra sense you lack: this special sixth sense
consists of contradicting the whole of the knowledge of your five.
The mystics of muscle do not bother to assert any claim to extrasensory
perception: they merely declare that your senses are not valid,
and that their wisdom consists of perceiving your blindness by some
manner of unspecified means.  Both kinds demand that you invalidate
your own consciousness and surrender yourself into their power.
They offer you, as proof of their superior knowledge, the fact that
they assert the opposite of everything you know, and as proof of their
superior ability to deal with existence, the fact that they lead you
to misery, self-sacrifice, starvation, destruction.

“They claim that they perceive a mode of being superior to your
existence on this earth.  The mystics of spirit call it ‘another
dimension,’ which consists of denying dimensions.  The mystics of
muscle call it ‘the future,’ which consists of denying the present.
To exist is to possess identity.  What identity are they able to give
to their superior realm?  They keep telling you what it is not,
but never tell you what it is.  All their identifications consist of negating:
God is that which no human mind can know, they say—and proceed to
demand that you consider it knowledge—God is non-man, heaven is
non-earth, soul is non-body, virtue is non-profit, A is non-A, perception is
non-sensory, knowledge is non-reason.  Their definitions are not acts
of defining, but of wiping out.

“It is only the metaphysics of a leech that would cling to the idea of
a universe where a zero is a standard of identification.  A leech
would want to seek escape from the necessity to name its own nature—
escape from the necessity to know that the substance on which
it builds its private universe is blood.

“What is the nature of that superior world to which they sacrifice the
world that exists?  The mystics of spirit curse matter, the mystics of
muscle curse profit—the first wish men to profit by renouncing the earth,
the second wish men to inherit the earth by renouncing all profit.
Their non-material, non-profit worlds are realms where rivers run with
milk and coffee, where wine spurts from rocks at their command, where
pastry drops on them from clouds at the price of opening their mouth.
On this material, profit-chasing earth, an enormous investment of virtue—
of intelligence, integrity, energy, skill—is required to construct a
railroad to carry them the distance of one mile; in their non-material,
non-profit world, they travel from planet to planet at the cost of a
wish.  If an honest person asks them: ‘How?’—they answer with
righteous scorn that a ‘how’ is the concept of vulgar realists;
the concept of superior spirits is ‘Somehow.’ On this earth restricted
by matter and profit, rewards are achieved by thought; in a world set
free of such restrictions, rewards are achieved by wishing.

“And that is the whole of their shabby secret.  The secret of all
their esoteric philosophies, of all their dialectics and super-senses,
of their evasive eyes and snarling words, the secret for which they
destroy civilization, language, industries and lives, the secret for
which they pierce their own eyes and eardrums, grind out their senses,
blank out their minds, the purpose for which they dissolve the
absolutes of reason, logic, matter, existence, reality—is to erect
upon that plastic fog a single holy absolute: their Wish.

“The restriction they seek to escape is the law of identity.  The
freedom they seek is freedom from the fact that an A will remain an A,
no matter what their tears or tantrums—that a river will not bring
them milk, no matter what their hunger—that water will not run uphill,
no matter what comforts they could gain if it did, and if they want to
lift it to the roof of a skyscraper, they must do it by a process of
thought and labor, in which the nature of an inch of pipe line counts,
but their feelings do not—that their feelings are impotent to alter
the course of a single speck of dust in space or the nature of any
action they have committed.

“Those who tell you that man is unable to perceive a reality undistorted
by his senses, mean that they are unwilling to perceive a reality
undistorted by their feelings.  ‘Things as they are’ are things as
perceived by your mind; divorce them from reason and they become
‘things as perceived by your wishes.’

“There is no honest revolt against reason—and when you accept any part
of their creed, your motive is to get away with something your reason
would not permit you to attempt.  The freedom you seek is freedom from
the fact that if you stole your wealth, you are a scoundrel, no matter
how much you give to charity or how many prayers you recite—that if
you sleep with sluts, you’re not a worthy husband, no matter how
anxiously you feel that you love your wife next morning—that you are
an entity, not a series of random pieces scattered through a universe
where nothing sticks and nothing commits you to anything, the universe
of a child’s nightmare where identities switch and swim, where the
rotter and the hero are interchangeable parts arbitrarily assumed at will—
that you are a man—that you are an entity—that you are.

“No matter how eagerly you claim that the goal of your mystic wishing
is a higher mode of life, the rebellion against identity is the wish for
non-existence.  The desire not to be anything is the desire not to be.

“Your teachers, the mystics of both schools, have reversed causality
in their consciousness, then strive to reverse it in existence.
They take their emotions as a cause, and their mind as a passive effect.
They make their emotions their tool for perceiving reality.  They hold
their desires as an irreducible primary, as a fact superseding all facts.
An honest man does not desire until he has identified the object of
his desire.  He says: ‘It is, therefore I want it.’ They say: ‘I want it,
therefore it is.’

“They want to cheat the axiom of existence and consciousness, they
want their consciousness to be an instrument not of perceiving but of
creating existence, and existence to be not the object but the subject
of their consciousness—they want to be that God they created in their
image and likeness, who creates a universe out of a void by means of
an arbitrary whim.  But reality is not to be cheated.  What they achieve
is the opposite of their desire.  They want an omnipotent power
over existence; instead, they lose the power of the consciousness.
By refusing to know, they condemn themselves to the horror of a
perpetual unknown.

“Those irrational wishes that draw you to their creed, those emotions
you worship as an idol, on whose altar you sacrifice the earth, that
dark, incoherent passion within you, which you take as the voice of
God or of your glands, is nothing more than the corpse of your mind.
An emotion that clashes with your reason, an emotion that you cannot
explain or control, is only the carcass of that stale thinking which
you forbade your mind to revise.

“Whenever you committed the evil of refusing to think and to see, of
exempting from the absolute of reality some one small wish of yours,
whenever you chose to say: Let me withdraw from the judgment of reason
the cookies I stole, or the existence of God, let me have my one
irrational whim and I will be a man of reason about all else—that was
the act of subverting your consciousness, the act of corrupting your mind.
Your mind then became a fixed jury who takes orders from a secret
underworld, whose verdict distorts the evidence to fit an absolute it
dares not touch—and a censored reality is the result, a splintered
reality where the bits you chose to see are floating among the chasms
of those you didn’t, held together by that embalming fluid of the mind
which is an emotion exempted from thought.

“The links you strive to drown are casual connections.  The enemy you
seek to defeat is the law of causality: it permits you no miracles.
The law of causality is the law of identity applied to action.
All actions are caused by entities.  The nature of an action is caused
and determined by the nature of the entities that act; a thing cannot
act in contradiction to its nature.  An action not caused by an entity
would be caused by a zero, which would mean a zero controlling a thing,
a non-entity controlling an entity, the non-existent ruling the existent—
which is the universe of your teachers’ desire, the cause of their
doctrines of causeless action, the reason of their revolt against
reason, the goal of their morality, their politics, their economics,
the ideal they strive for: the reign of the zero.

“The law of identity does not permit you to have your cake and eat it,
too.  The law of causality does not permit you to eat your cake before
you have it.  But if you drown both laws in the blanks of your mind,
if you pretend to yourself and to others that you don’t see—then you
can try to proclaim your right to eat your cake today and mine
tomorrow, you can preach that the way to have a cake is to eat it
first, before you bake it, that the way to produce is to start by
consuming, that all wishers have an equal claim to all things, since
nothing is caused by anything.  The corollary of the causeless in
matter is the unearned in spirit.

“Whenever you rebel against causality, your motive is the fraudulent
desire, not to escape it, but worse: to reverse it.  You want unearned love,
as if love, the effect, could give you personal value, the cause—
you want unearned admiration, as if admiration, the effect, could give
you virtue, the cause—you want unearned wealth, as if wealth, the effect,
could give you ability, the cause—you plead for mercy, mercy, not justice,
as if an unearned forgiveness could wipe out the cause of your plea.
And to indulge your ugly little shams, you support the doctrines of
your teachers, while they run hog-wild proclaiming that spending,
the effect, creates riches, the cause; that machinery, the effect,
creates intelligence, the cause; that your sexual desires, the effect, create
your philosophical values, the cause.

“Who pays for the orgy?  Who causes the causeless?  Who are the victims,
condemned to remain unacknowledged and to perish in silence,
lest their agony disturb your pretense that they do not exist?
We are, we, the men of the mind.

“We are the cause of all the values that you covet, we who perform the
process of thinking, which is the process of defining identity and
discovering causal connections.  We taught you to know, to speak,
to produce, to desire, to love.  You who abandon reason—were it not
for us who preserve it, you would not be able to fulfill or even to
conceive your wishes.  You would not be able to desire the clothes
that had not been made, the automobile that had not been invented,
the money that had not been devised, as exchange for goods that did
not exist, the admiration that had not been experienced for men who
had achieved nothing, the love that belongs and pertains only to those
who preserve their capacity to think, to choose, to value.

“You—who leap like a savage out of the jungle of your feelings to the
Fifth Avenue of our New York and proclaim that you want to keep the
electric lights, but to destroy the generators—it is our wealth that
you use while destroying us, it is our values that you use while
damning us, it is our language that you use while denying the mind.

“Just as your mystics of spirit invented their heaven in the image of
our earth, omitting our existence, and promised you rewards created by
miracle out of non-matter—so your modern mystics of muscle omit our
existence and promise you a heaven where matter shapes itself of its
own causeless will into all the rewards desired by your non-mind.

“For centuries, the mystics of spirit had existed by running a
protection racket—by making life on earth unbearable, then charging
you for consolation and relief, by forbidding all the virtues that
make existence possible, then riding on the shoulders of your guilt,
by declaring production and joy to be sins, then collecting blackmail
from the sinners.  We, the men of the mind, were the unnamed victims
of their creed, we who were willing to break their moral code and to
bear damnation for the sin of reason—we who thought and acted,
while they wished and prayed-we who were moral outcasts, we who were
bootleggers of life when life was held to be a crime—while they basked
in moral glory for the virtue of surpassing material greed and of
distributing in selfless charity the material goods produced by—blank-out.

“Now we are chained and commanded to produce by savages who do not
grant us even the identification of sinners—by savages who proclaim
that we do not exist, then threaten to deprive us of the life we don’t possess,
if we fail to provide them with the goods we don’t produce.
Now we are expected to continue running railroads and to know the
minute when a train will arrive after crossing the span of a continent,
we are expected to continue running steel mills and to know the
molecular structure of every drop of metal in the cables of your
bridges and in the body of the airplanes that support you in mid-air—
while the tribes of your grotesque little mystics of muscle fight over
the carcass of our world, gibbering in sounds of non-language that
there are no principles, no absolutes, no knowledge, no mind.

“Dropping below the level of a savage, who believes that the magic
words he utters have the power to alter reality, they believe that
reality can be altered by the power of the words they do not utter—
and their magic tool is the blank-out, the pretense that nothing can
come into existence past the voodoo of their refusal to identify it.

“As they feed on stolen wealth in body, so they feed on stolen
concepts in mind, and proclaim that honesty consists of refusing to
know that one is stealing.  As they use effects while denying causes,
so they use our concepts while denying the roots and the existence of
the concepts they are using.  As they seek, not to build, but to take
over industrial plants, so they seek, not to think, but to take over
human thinking.

“As they proclaim that the only requirement for running a factory is
the ability to turn the cranks of the machines, and blank out the question
of who created the factory—so they proclaim that there are no entities,
that nothing exists but motion, and blank out the fact that motion
presupposes the thing which moves, that without the concept of entity,
there can be no such concept as ‘motion.’ As they proclaim their right to
consume the unearned, and blank out the question of who’s to produce it—
so they proclaim that there is no law of identity, that nothing exists
but change, and blank out the fact that change presupposes the
concepts of what changes, from what and to what, that, without the law
of identity no such concept as ‘change’ is possible.  As they rob an
industrialist while denying his value, so they seek to seize power
over all of existence while denying that existence exists.

“‘We know that we know nothing,’ they chatter, blanking out the fact
that they are claiming knowledge—’There are not absolutes,’ they
chatter, blanking out the fact that they are uttering an absolute—
’You cannot prove that you exist or that you’re conscious,’ they chatter,
blanking out the fact that proof presupposes existence, consciousness
and a complex chain of knowledge: the existence of something to know,
of a consciousness able to know it, and of a knowledge that has learned
to distinguish between such concepts as the proved and the unproved.

“When a savage who has not learned to speak declares that existence
must be proved, he is asking you to prove it by means of non-existence—
when he declares that your consciousness must be proved, he is asking
you to prove it by means of unconsciousness—he is asking you to step
into a void outside of existence and consciousness to give him proof of both—
he is asking you to become a zero gaining knowledge about a zero.

“When he declares that an axiom is a matter of arbitrary choice and he
doesn’t choose to accept the axiom that he exists, he blanks out the
fact that he has accepted it by uttering that sentence, that the only
way to reject it is to shut one’s mouth, expound no theories and die.

“An axiom is a statement that identifies the base of knowledge and of
any further statement pertaining to that knowledge, a statement
necessarily contained in all others, whether any particular speaker
chooses to identify it or not.  An axiom is a proposition that defeats
its opponents by the fact that they have to accept it and use it in
the process of any attempt to deny it.  Let the caveman who does not
choose to accept the axiom of identity, try to present his theory
without using the concept of identity or any concept derived from it—
let the anthropoid who does not choose to accept the existence of nouns,
try to devise a language without nouns, adjectives or verbs—
let the witch-doctor who does not choose to accept the validity of
sensory perception, try to prove it without using the data he obtained
by sensory perception—let the head-hunter who does not choose to
accept the validity of logic, try to prove it without using logic—
let the pigmy who proclaims that a skyscraper needs no foundation
after it reaches its fiftieth story, yank the base from under his building,
not yours—let the cannibal who snarls that the freedom of man’s mind
was needed to create an industrial civilization, but is not needed to
maintain it, be given an arrowhead and bearskin, not a university
chair of economics.

“Do you think they are taking you back to dark ages?  They are taking
you back to darker ages than any your history has known.  Their goal
is not the era of pre-science, but the era of pre-language.  Their purpose
is to deprive you of the concept on which man’s mind, his life and his
culture depend: the concept of an objective reality.  Identify the
development of a human consciousness—and you will know the purpose of
their creed.

“A savage is a being who has not grasped that A is A and that reality
is real.  He has arrested his mind at the level of a baby’s, at the
state when a consciousness acquires its initial sensory perception and
has not learned to distinguish solid objects.  It is to a baby that
the world appears as a blur of motion, without things that move—
and the birth of his mind is the day when he grasps that the streak
that keeps flickering past him is his mother and the whirl beyond her
is a curtain, that the two are solid entities and neither can turn
into the other, that they are what they are, that they exist.  The day
when he grasps that matter has no volition is the day when he grasps
that he has—and this is his birth as a human being.  The day when he
grasps that the reflection he sees in a mirror is not a delusion,
that it is real, but it is not himself, that the mirage he sees in a
desert is not a delusion, that the air and the light rays that cause
it are real, but it is not a city, it is a city’s reflection—the day
when he grasps that he is not a passive recipient of the sensations of
any given moment, that his senses do not provide him with automatic
knowledge in separate snatches independent of context, but only with
the material of knowledge, which his mind must learn to integrate—
the day when he grasps that his senses cannot deceive him,
that physical objects cannot act without causes, that his organs of
perception are physical and have no volition, no power to invent or to
distort, that the evidence they give him is an absolute, but his mind
must learn to understand it, his mind must discover the nature,
the causes, the full context of his sensory material, his mind must
identify the things that he perceives—that is the day of his birth as
a thinker and scientist.

“We are the men who reach that day; you are the men who choose to
reach it partly; a savage is a man who never does.

“To a savage, the world is a place of unintelligible miracles where
anything is possible to inanimate matter and nothing is possible to him.
His world is not the unknown, but that irrational horror: the unknowable.
He believes that physical objects are endowed with a mysterious
volition, moved by causeless, unpredictable whims, while he is a
helpless pawn at the mercy of forces beyond his control.  He believes
that nature is ruled by demons who possess an omnipotent power and
that reality is their fluid plaything, where they can turn his bowl of
meal into a snake and his wife into a beetle at any moment, where the
A he has never discovered can be any non-A they choose, where the only
knowledge he possesses is that he must not attempt to know.  He can
count on nothing, he can only wish, and he spends his life on wishing,
on begging his demons to grant him his wishes by the arbitrary power
of their will, giving them credit when they do, taking the blame when
they don’t, offering them sacrifices in token of his gratitude and
sacrifices in token of his guilt, crawling on his belly in fear and
worship of sun and moon and wind and rain and of any thug who
announces himself as their spokesman, provided his words are
unintelligible and his mask sufficiently frightening—he wishes,
begs and crawls, and dies, leaving you, as a record of his view of
existence, the distorted monstrosities of his idols, part-man,
part-animal, part-spider, the embodiments of the world of non-A.

“His is the intellectual state of your modern teachers and his is the
world to which they want to bring you.

“If you wonder by what means they propose to do it, walk into any
college classroom and you will hear your professors teaching your
children that man can be certain of nothing, that his consciousness
has no validity whatever, that he can learn no facts and no laws of
existence, that he’s incapable of knowing an objective reality.  What,
then, is his standard of knowledge and truth?  Whatever others
believe, is their answer.  There is no knowledge, they teach, there’s
only faith: your belief that you exist is an act of faith, no more
valid than another’s faith in his right to kill you; the axioms of
science are an act of faith, no more valid than a mystic’s faith in
revelations; the belief that electric light can be produced by ‘a
generator is an act of faith, no more valid than the belief that it
can be produced by a rabbit’s foot kissed under a stepladder on the
first of the moon-truth is whatever people want it to be, and people
are everyone except yourself; reality is whatever people choose to say
it is, there are no objective facts, there are only people’s arbitrary
wishes-a man who seeks knowledge in a laboratory by means of test
tubes and logic is an old-fashioned, superstitious fool; a true
scientist is a man who goes around taking public polls-and if it
weren’t for the selfish greed of the manufacturers of steel girders,
who have a vested interest in obstructing the progress of science, you
would learn that New York City does not exist, because a poll of the
entire population of the world would tell you by a landslide majority
that their beliefs forbid its existence.

“For centuries, the mystics of spirit have proclaimed that faith is
superior to reason, but have not dared deny the existence of reason.
Their heirs and products, the mystics of muscle, have completed their
job and achieved their dream: they proclaim that everything is faith,
and call it a revolt against believing.  As revolt against unproved
assertions, they proclaim that nothing can be proved; as revolt
against supernatural knowledge, they proclaim that no knowledge is
possible; as-revolt against the enemies of science, they proclaim that
science is superstition; as revolt against the enslavement of the
mind, they proclaim that there is no mind.

“If you surrender your power to perceive, if you accept the switch of
your standard from the objective to the collective and wait for
mankind to tell you what to think, you will find another switch taking
place before the eyes you have renounced: you will find that your
teachers become the rulers of the collective, and if you then refuse
to obey them, protesting that they are not the whole of mankind, they
will answer: ‘By what means do you know that we are not?  Are,
brother?  Where did you get that old-fashioned term?’

“If you doubt that such is their purpose, observe with what passionate
consistency the mystics of muscle are striving to make you forget that
a concept such as ‘Mind’ has ever existed.  Observe the twists of
undefined verbiage, the words with rubber meanings, the terms left
floating in midstream, by means of which they try to get around the
recognition of the concept of ‘thinking.’ Your consciousness, they
tell you, consists of ‘reflexes,’ ‘reactions,’ ‘experiences,’ ‘urges,’
and ‘drives’-and refuse to identify the means by which they acquired
that knowledge, to identify the act they are performing when they tell
it or the act you are performing when you listen.  Words have the
power to ‘consider’ you, they say and refuse to identify the reason
why words have the power to change your-blank-out.  A student reading
a book understands it through a process of-blank-out.  A scientist
working on an invention is engaged in the activity of-blank-out.  A
psychologist helping a neurotic to solve a problem and untangle a
conflict, does it by means of-blank-out.  An industrialist-blank-out-
there is no such person.  A factory is a ‘natural resource,’ like a tree,
a rock or a mud puddle.

“The problem of production, they tell you, has been solved and
deserves no study or concern; the only problem left for your
‘reflexes’ to solve is now the problem of distribution.  Who solved
the problem of production?  Humanity, they answer.  What was the
solution?  The goods are here.  How did they get here?  Somehow.  What
caused it?  Nothing has causes.

“They proclaim that every man born is entitled to exist without labor
and, the laws of reality to the contrary notwithstanding, is entitled
to receive his ‘minimum sustenance’-his food, his clothes, his
shelter-with no effort on his part, as his due and his birthright.  To
receive it-from whom?  Blank-out.  Every man, they announce, owns an
equal share of the technological benefits created in the world.
Created-by whom?  Blank-out.  Frantic cowards who posture as defenders
of industrialists now define the purpose of economics as ‘an
adjustment between the unlimited desires of men and the goods supplied
in limited quantity.’ Supplied-by whom?  Blank-out.  Intellectual
hoodlums who pose as professors, shrug away the thinkers of the past
by declaring that their social theories were based on the impractical
assumption that man was a rational being-but since men are not
rational, they declare, there ought to be established a system that
will make it possible for them to exist while being irrational, which
means: while defying reality.  Who will make it possible?  Blank-out.
Any stray mediocrity rushes into print with plans to control the
production of mankind-and whoever agrees or disagrees with his
statistics, no one questions his right to enforce his plans by means
of a gun.  Enforce-on whom?  Blank-out.  Random females with causeless
incomes titter on trips around the globe and return to deliver the
message that the backward peoples of the world demand a higher
standard of living.  Demand-of whom?  Blank-out.

“And to forestall any inquiry into the cause of the difference between
a jungle village and New York City, they resort to the ultimate
obscenity of explaining man’s industrial progress-skyscrapers, cable
bridges, power motors, railroad trains-by declaring that man is an
animal who possesses an ‘instinct of tool-making.’

“Did you wonder what is wrong with the world?  You are now seeing the
climax of the creed of the uncaused and unearned.  All your gangs of
mystics, of spirit or muscle, are fighting one another for power to
rule you, snarling that love is the solution for all the problems of
your spirit and that a whip is the solution for all the problems of
your body-you who have agreed to have no mind.  Granting man less
dignity than they grant to cattle, ignoring what an animal trainer
could tell them-that no animal can be trained by fear, that a tortured
elephant will trample its torturer, but will not work for him or carry
his burdens-they expect man to continue to produce electronic tubes,
supersonic airplanes, atom-smashing engines and interstellar
telescopes, with his ration of meat for reward and a lash on his back
for incentive.

“Make no mistake about the character of mystics.  To undercut your
consciousness has always been their only purpose throughout the
ages-and power, the power to rule you by force, has always been their
only lust.

“From the rites of the jungle witch-doctors, which distorted reality
into grotesque absurdities, stunted the minds of their victims and
kept them in terror of the supernatural for stagnant stretches of
centuries-to the supernatural doctrines of the Middle Ages, which kept
men huddling on the mud floors of their-hovels, in terror that the
devil might steal the soup they had worked eighteen hours to earn-to
the seedy little smiling professor who assures you that your brain has
no capacity to think, that you have no means of perception and must
blindly obey the omnipotent will of that supernatural force:
Society-all of it is the same performance for the same and only
purpose: to reduce you to the kind of pulp that has surrendered the
validity of its consciousness.

“But it cannot be done to you without your consent.  If you permit it
to be done, you deserve it.

“When you listen to a mystic’s harangue on the impotence of the human
mind and begin to doubt your consciousness, not his, when you permit
your precariously semi-rational state to be shaken by any assertion
and decide it is safer to trust his superior certainty and knowledge,
the joke is on both of you: your sanction is the only source of
certainty he has.  The supernatural power that a mystic dreads, the
unknowable spirit he worships, the consciousness he considers
omnipotent is-yours.

“A mystic is a man who surrendered his mind at its first encounter
with the minds of others.  Somewhere in the distant reaches of his
childhood, when his own understanding of reality clashed with the
assertions of others, with their arbitrary orders and contradictory
demands, he gave in to so craven a fear of independence that he
renounced his rational faculty.  At the crossroads of the choice
between ‘I know’ and ‘They say,’ he chose the authority of others, he
chose to submit rather than to understand, to believe rather than to
think.  Faith in the supernatural begins as faith in the superiority
of others.  His surrender took the form of the feeling that he must
hide his lack of understanding, that others possess some mysterious
knowledge of which he alone is deprived, that reality is whatever they
want it to be, through some means forever denied to him.

“From then on, afraid to think, he is left at the mercy of
unidentified feelings.  His feelings become his only guide, his only
remnant of personal identity, he clings to them with ferocious
possessiveness-and whatever thinking he does is devoted to the
struggle of hiding from himself that the nature of his feelings is
terror.

“When a mystic declares that he feels the existence of a power
superior to reason, he feels it all right, but that power is not an
omniscient super-spirit of the universe, it is the consciousness of
any passer-by to whom he has surrendered his own.  A mystic is driven
by the urge to impress, to cheat, to flatter, to deceive, to force
that omnipotent consciousness of others.  ‘They’ are his only key to
reality, he feels that he cannot exist save by harnessing their
mysterious power and extorting their unaccountable consent.  ‘They’
are his only means of perception and, like a blind man who depends on
the sight of a dog, he feels he must leash them in order to live.  To
control the consciousness of others becomes his only passion;
power-lust is a weed that grows only in the vacant lots of an
abandoned mind.

“Every dictator is a mystic, and every mystic is a potential dictator.
A mystic craves obedience from men, not their agreement.  He wants
them to surrender their consciousness to his assertions, his edicts,
his wishes, his whims-as his consciousness is surrendered to theirs.
He wants to deal with men by means of faith and force-he finds no
satisfaction in their consent if he must earn it by means of facts and
reason.  Reason is the enemy he dreads and, simultaneously, considers
precarious: reason, to him, is a means of deception, he feels that men
possess some power more potent than reason-and only their causeless
belief or their forced obedience can give him a sense of security, a
proof that he has gained control of the mystic endowment he lacked.
His lust is to command, not to convince: conviction requires an act of
independence and press on the absolute of an objective reality.  What
he seeks is power over reality and over men’s means of perceiving it,
their mind, the power to interpose his will between existence and
consciousness, as if, by agreeing to fake the reality he orders them
to fake, men would, in fact, create it.

“Just as the mystic is a parasite in matter, who expropriates the
wealth created by others-just as he is a parasite in spirit, who
plunders the ideas created by others-so he falls below the level of a
lunatic who creates his own distortion of reality, to the level of a
parasite of lunacy who seeks a distortion created by others.

“There is only one state that fulfills the mystic’s longing for
infinity, non-causality, non-identity: death.  No matter what
unintelligible causes he ascribes to his incommunicable feelings,
whoever rejects reality rejects existence-and the feelings that move
him from then on are hatred for all the values of man’s life, and lust
for all the evils that destroy it.  A mystic relishes the spectacle of
suffering, of poverty, subservience and terror; these give him a
feeling of triumph, a proof of the defeat of rational reality.  But no
other reality exists.

“No matter whose welfare he professes to serve, be it the welfare of
God or of that disembodied gargoyle he describes as ‘The People,’ no
matter what ideal he proclaims in terms of some supernatural
dimension-in fact, in reality, on earth, his ideal is death, his
craving is to kill, his only satisfaction is to torture.

“Destruction is the only end that the mystics’ creed has ever
achieved, as it is the only end that, you see them achieving today,
and if the ravages wrought by their acts have not made them question
their doctrines, if they profess to be moved by love, yet are not
deterred by piles of human corpses, it is because the truth about
their souls is worse than the obscene excuse you have allowed them,
the excuse that the end justifies the means and that the horrors they
practice are means to nobler ends.  The truth is that those horrors
are their ends.

“You who’re depraved enough to believe that you could adjust yourself
to a mystic’s dictatorship and could please him by obeying his
orders-there is no way to please him; when you obey, he will reverse
his orders; he seeks obedience for the sake of obedience and
destruction for the sake of destruction.  You who are craven enough to
believe that you can make terms with a mystic by giving in to his
extortions-there is no way to buy him off, the bribe he wants is your
life, as slowly or as fast as you are willing to give it in-and the
monster he seeks to bribe is the hidden blank-out in his mind, which
drives him to kill in order not to learn that the death he desires is
his own.

“You who are innocent enough to believe that the forces let loose in
your world today are moved by greed for material plunder-the mystics’
scramble for spoils is only a screen to conceal from their mind the
nature of their motive.  Wealth is a means of human life, and they
clamor for wealth in imitation of living beings, to pretend to
themselves that they desire to live, but their swinish indulgence in
plundered luxury is not enjoyment, it is escape.  They do not want to
own your fortune, they want you to lose it; they do not want to
succeed, they want you to fail; they do not want to live, they want
you to die; they desire nothing, they hate existence, and they keep
running, each trying not to learn that the object of his hatred is
himself.

“You who’ve never grasped the nature of evil, you who describe them as
‘misguided idealists’-may the God you invented forgive you!-they are
the essence of evil, they, those anti-living objects who seek, by
devouring the world, to fill the selfless zero of their soul.  It is
not your wealth that they’re after.  Theirs is a conspiracy against
the mind, which means: against life and man.

“It is a conspiracy without leader or direction, and the random little
thugs of the moment who cash in on the agony of one land or another
are chance scum riding the torrent from the broken dam of the sewer of
centuries, from the reservoir of hatred for reason, for logic, for
ability, for achievement, for joy, stored by every whining anti-human
who ever preached the superiority of the ‘heart’ over the mind.

“It is a conspiracy of all those who seek, not to live, but to get
away with living, those who seek to cut just one small corner of
reality and are drawn, by feeling, to all the others who are busy
cutting other corners-a conspiracy that unites by links of evasion all
those who pursue a zero as a value: the professor who, unable to
think, takes pleasure in crippling the mind of his students, the
businessman who, to protect his stagnation, takes pleasure in chaining
the ability of competitors, the neurotic who, to defend his
self-loathing, takes pleasure in breaking men of self-esteem, the
incompetent who takes pleasure in defeating achievement, the
mediocrity who takes pleasure in demolishing greatness, the eunuch who
takes pleasure in the castration of all pleasure-and all their
intellectual munition-makers, all those who preach that the immolation
of virtue will transform vices into virtue.  Death is the premise at
the root of their theories, death is the goal of their actions in
practice-and you are the last of their victims.

“We, who are the living buffers between you and the nature of your
creed, are no longer there to save you from the effects of your chosen
beliefs.  We are no longer willing to pay with our lives the debts you
incurred in yours or the moral deficit piled up by all the generations
behind you.  You had been living on borrowed time-and I am the man who
has called in the loan.

“I am the man whose existence your blank-outs were intended to permit
you to ignore.  I am the man whom you did not want either to live or
to die.  You did not want me to live, because you were afraid of
knowing that I carried the responsibility you dropped and that your
lives depended upon me; you did not want me to die, because you knew
it.

“Twelve years ago, when I worked in your world, I was an inventor.  I
was one of a profession that came last in human history and will be
first to vanish on the way back to the sub-human.  An inventor is a
man who asks ‘Why?’ of the universe and lets nothing stand between the
answer and his mind.

“Like the man who discovered the use of steam or the man who
discovered the use oil, I discovered a source of energy which was
available since the birth of the globe, but which men had not known
how to use except as an object of worship, of terror and of legends
without a thundering god.  I completed the experimental model of a
motor that would have made a fortune for me and for those who had
hired me, a motor that would have raised the efficiency of every human
installation using power and would have added the gift of higher
productivity to every hour you spend at earning your living.

“Then, one night at a factory meeting, I heard myself sentenced to
death by reason of my achievement.  I heard three parasites assert
that my brain and my life were their property, that my right to exist
was conditional and depended on the satisfaction of their desires.
The purpose of my ability, they said, was to serve the needs of those
who were less able.  I had no right to live, they said, by reason of
my competence for living: their right to live was unconditional, by
reason of their incompetence.

“Then I saw what was wrong with the world, I saw what destroyed men
and nations, and where the battle for life had to be fought.  I saw
that the enemy was an inverted morality-and that my sanction was its
only power.  I saw that evil was impotent-that evil was the
irrational, the blind, the anti-real-and that the only weapon of its
triumph was the willingness of the good to serve it.  Just as the
parasites around me were proclaiming their helpless dependence on my
mind and were expecting me voluntarily to accept a slavery they had no
power to enforce, just as they were counting on my self-immolation to
provide them with the means of their plan-so throughout the world and
throughout men’s history, in every version and form, from the
extortions of loafing relatives to the atrocities of collective
countries, it is the good, the able, the men of reason, who act as
their own destroyers, who transfuse to evil the blood of their virtue
and let evil transmit to them the poison of destruction, thus gaining
for evil the power of survival, and for their own values-the impotence
of death.  I saw that there comes a point, in the defeat of any man of
virtue, when his own consent is needed for evil to win-and that no
manner of injury done to him by others can succeed if he chooses to
withhold his consent.  I saw that I could put an end to your outrages
by pronouncing a single word in my mind.  I pronounced it.  The word
was ‘No.’

“I quit that factory.  I quit your world, I made it my job to warn
your victims and to give them the method and the weapon to fight you.
The method was to refuse to deflect retribution.  The weapon was
justice.

“If you want to know what you lost when I quit and when my strikers
deserted your world-stand on an empty stretch of soil in a wilderness
unexplored by men and ask yourself what manner of survival you would
achieve and how long you would last if you refused to think, with no
one around to teach you the motions, or, if you chose to think, how
much your mind would be able to discover-ask yourself how many
independent conclusions you have reached in the course of your life
and how much of your time was spent on performing the actions you
learned from others-ask yourself whether you would be able to discover
how to till the soil and grow your food, whether you would be able to
invent a wheel, a lever, an induction coil, a generator, an electronic
tube-then decide whether men of ability are exploiters who live by the
fruit of your labor and rob you of the wealth that you produce, and
whether you dare to believe that you possess the power to enslave
them.  Let your women take a look at a jungle female with her
shriveled face and pendulous breasts, as she sits grinding meal in a
bowl, hour after hour, century by century-then let them ask themselves
whether their ‘instinct of tool-making’ will provide them with their
electric refrigerators, their washing machines and vacuum cleaners,
and, if not, whether they care to destroy those who provided it all,
but not ‘by instinct.’

“Take a look around you, you savages who stutter that ideas are
created by men’s means of production, that a machine is not the
product of human thought, but a mystical power that produces human
thinking.  You have never discovered the industrial age-and you cling
to the morality of the barbarian eras when a miserable form of human
subsistence was produced by the muscular labor of slaves.  Every
mystic had always longed for slaves, to protect him from the material
reality he dreaded.  But you, you grotesque little atavists, stare
blindly at the skyscrapers and smokestacks around you and dream of
enslaving the material providers who are scientists, inventors,
industrialists.  When you clamor for public ownership of the means of
production, you are clamoring for public ownership of the mind.  I
have taught my strikers that the answer you deserve is only: ‘Try and
get it.’

“You proclaim yourself unable to harness the forces of inanimate
matter, yet propose to harness the minds of men who are able to
achieve the feats you cannot equal.  You proclaim that you cannot
survive without us, yet propose to dictate the terms of our survival.
You proclaim that you need us, yet indulge the impertinence of
asserting your right to rule us by force-and expect that we, who are
not afraid of that physical nature which fills you with terror, will
cower at the sight of any lout who has talked you into voting him a
chance to command us.

“You propose to establish a social order based on the following
tenets: that you’re incompetent to run your own life, but competent to
run the lives of others-that you’re unfit to exist in freedom, but fit
to become an omnipotent ruler-that you’re unable to earn your living
by the use of your own intelligence, but able to judge politicians and
to vote them into jobs of total power over arts you have never seen,
over sciences you have never studied, over achievements of which you
have no knowledge, over the gigantic industries where you, by your own
definition of your capacity, would be unable successfully to fill the
job of assistant greaser.

“This idol of your cult of zero-worship, this symbol of impotence-the
congenital dependent-is your image of man and your standard of value,
in whose likeness you strive to refashion your soul.  ‘It’s only
human,’ you cry in defense of any depravity, reaching the stage of
self-abasement where you seek to make the concept ‘human’ mean the
weakling, the fool, the rotter, the liar, the failure, the coward, the
fraud, and to exile from the human race the hero, the thinker, the
producer, the inventor, the strong, the purposeful, the pure-as if ‘to
feel’ were human, but to think were not, as if to fail were human, but
to succeed were not, as if corruption were human, but virtue were
not-as if the premise of death were proper to man, but the premise of
life were not.

“In order to deprive us of honor, that you may then deprive us of our
wealth, you have always regarded us as slaves who deserve no moral
recognition.  You praise any venture that claims to be non-profit, and
damn the men who made the profits that make the venture possible.  You
regard as ‘in the public interest’ any project serving those who do
not pay; it is not in the public interest to provide any services for
those who do the paying.  ‘Public benefit’ is anything given as alms;
to engage in trade is to injure the public.  ‘Public welfare’ is the
welfare of those who do not earn it; those who do, are entitled to no
welfare.  ‘The public,’ to you, is whoever has failed to achieve any
virtue or value; whoever achieves it, whoever provides the goods you
require for survival, ceases to be regarded as part of the public or
as part of the human race.

“What blank-out permitted you to hope that you could get away with
this muck of contradictions and to plan it as an ideal society, when
the ‘No’ of your victims was sufficient to demolish the whole of your
structure?  What permits any insolent beggar to wave his sores in the
face of his betters and to plead for help in the tone of a threat?
You cry, as he does, that you are counting on our pity, but your
secret hope is the moral code that has taught you to count on our
guilt.  You expect us to feel guilty of our virtues in the presence of
your vices, wounds and failures-guilty of succeeding at existence,
guilty of enjoying the life that you damn, yet beg us to help you to
live.

“Did you want to know who is John Galt?  I am the first man of ability
who refused to regard it as guilt.  I am the first man who would not
do penance for my virtues or let them be used as the tools of my
destruction.  I am the first man who would not suffer martyrdom at the
hands of those who wished me to perish for the privilege of keeping
them alive.  I am the first man who told them that I did not need
them, and until they learned to deal with me as traders, giving value
for value, they would have to exist without me, as I would exist
without them; then I would let them learn whose is the need and whose
the ability-and if human survival is the standard, whose terms would
set the way to survive.

“I have done by plan and intention what has been done throughout
history by silent default.  There have always been men of intelligence
who went on strike, in protest and despair, but they did not know the
meaning of their action.  The man who retires from public life, to
think, but not to share his thoughts-the man who chooses to spend his
years in the obscurity of menial employment, keeping to himself the
fire of his mind, never giving it form, expression or reality,
refusing to bring it into a world he despises-the man who is defeated
by revulsion, the man who renounces before he has started, the man who
gives up rather than give in, the man who functions at a fraction of
his capacity, disarmed by his longing for an ideal he has not
found-they are on strike, on strike against unreason, on strike
against your world and your values.  But not knowing any values of
their own, they abandon the quest to know-in the darkness of their
hopeless indignation, which is righteous without knowledge of the
fight, and passionate without knowledge of desire, they concede to you
the power of reality and surrender the incentives of their mind-and
they perish in bitter futility, as rebels who never learned the object
of their rebellion, as lovers who never discovered their love.

“The infamous times you call the Dark Ages were an era of intelligence
on strike, when men of ability went underground and lived
undiscovered, studying in secret, and died; destroying the works of
their mind, when only a few of the bravest of martyrs remained to keep
the human race alive.  Every period ruled by mystics was an era of
stagnation and want, when most men were on strike against existence,
working for less than their barest survival, leaving nothing but
scraps for their rulers to loot, refusing to think, to venture, to
produce, when the ultimate collector of their profits and the final
authority on truth or error was the whim of some gilded degenerate
sanctioned as superior to reason by divine right and by grace of a
club.  The road of human history was a string of blank-outs over
sterile stretches eroded by faith and force, with only a few brief
bursts of sunlight, when the released energy of the men of the mind
performed the wonders you gaped at, admired and promptly extinguished
again.

“But there will be no extinction, this time.  The game of the mystics
is up.  You will perish in and by your own unreality.  We, the men of
reason, will survive.

“I have called out on strike the kind of martyrs who had never
deserted you before.  I have given them the weapon they had lacked:
the knowledge of their own moral value.  I have taught them that the
world is ours, whenever we choose to claim it, by virtue and grace of
the fact that ours is the Morality of Life.  They, the great victims
who had produced all the wonders of humanity’s brief summer, they, the
industrialists, the conquerors of matter, had not discovered the
nature of their right.  They had known that theirs was the power.  I
taught them that theirs was the glory.

“You, who dare to regard us as the moral inferiors of any mystic who
claims supernatural visions-you, who scramble like vultures for
plundered pennies, yet honor a fortune-teller above a
fortune-maker-you, who scorn a businessman as ignoble, but esteem any
posturing artist as exalted-the root of your standards is that mystic
miasma which comes from primordial swamps, that cult of death, which
pronounces a businessman immoral by reason of the fact that he keeps
you alive.  You, who claim that you long to rise above the crude
concerns of the body, above the drudgery of serving mere physical
needs-who is enslaved by physical needs: the Hindu who labors from
sunrise to sunset at the shafts of a hand-plow for a bowl of rice, or
the American who is driving a tractor?  Who is the conqueror of
physical reality: the man who sleeps on a bed of nails or the man who
sleeps on an inner-spring mattress?  Which is the monument to the
triumph of the human spirit over matter: the germ-eaten hovels on the
shorelines of the Ganges or the Atlantic skyline of New York?

“Unless you learn the answers to these questions-and learn to stand at
reverent attention when you face the achievements of man’s mind-you
will not stay much longer on this earth, which we love and will not
permit you to damn.  You will not sneak by with the rest of your
lifespan.  I have foreshortened the usual course of history and have
let you discover the nature of the payment you had hoped to switch to
the shoulders of others.  It is the last of your own living power that
will now be drained to provide the unearned for the worshippers and
carriers of Death.  Do not pretend that a malevolent reality defeated
you-you were defeated by your own evasions.  Do not pretend that you
will perish for a noble ideal-you will perish as fodder for the haters
of man.

“But to those of you who still retain a remnant of the dignity and
will to love one’s life, I am offering the chance to make a choice.
Choose whether you wish to perish for a morality you have never
believed or practiced.  Pause on the brink of self-destruction and
examine your values and your life.  You had known how to take an
inventory of your wealth.  Now take an inventory of your mind.

“Since childhood, you have been hiding the guilty secret that you feel
no desire to be moral, no desire to seek self-immolation, that you
dread and hate your code, but dare not say it even to yourself, that
you’re devoid of those moral ‘instincts’ which others profess to feel.
The less you felt, the louder you proclaimed your selfless love and
servitude to others, in dread of ever letting them discover your own
self, the self that you betrayed, the self that you kept in
concealment, like a skeleton in the closet of your body.  And they,
who were at once your dupes and your deceivers, they listened and
voiced their loud approval, in dread of ever letting you discover that
they were harboring the same unspoken secret.  Existence among you is
a giant pretense, an act you all perform for one another, each feeling
that he is the only guilty freak, each placing his moral authority in
the unknowable known only to others, each faking the reality he feels
they expect him to fake, some having the courage to break the vicious
circle.

“No matter what dishonorable compromise you’ve made with your
impracticable creed, no matter what miserable balance, half-cynicism,
half-superstition, you now manage to maintain, you still preserve the
root, the lethal tenet: the belief that the moral and the practical
are opposites.  Since childhood, you have been running from the terror
of a choice you have never dared fully to identify: If the practical,
whatever you must practice to exist, whatever works, succeeds,
achieves your purpose, whatever brings you food and joy, whatever
profits you, is evil-and if the good, the moral, is the impractical,
whatever fails, destroys, frustrates, whatever injures you and brings
you loss or pain-then your choice is to be moral or to live.

“The sole result of that murderous doctrine was to remove morality
from life.  You grew up to believe that moral laws bear no relation to
the job of living, except as an impediment and threat, that man’s
existence is an amoral jungle where anything goes and anything works.
And in that fog of switching definitions which descends upon a frozen
mind, you have forgotten that the evils damned by your creed were the
virtues required for living, and you have come to believe that actual
evils are the practical means of existence.  Forgetting that the
impractical ‘good’ was self-sacrifice, you believe that self-esteem is
impractical; forgetting that the practical ‘evil’ was production, you
believe that robbery is practical.

“Swinging like a helpless branch in the wind of an uncharted moral
wilderness, you dare not fully to be evil or fully to live.  When you
are honest, you feel the resentment of a sucker; when you cheat, you
feel terror and shame, your pain is augmented by the feeling that pain
is your natural state.  You pity the men you admire, you believe they
are doomed to fail; you envy the men you hate, you believe they are
the masters of existence.  You feel disarmed when you come up against
a scoundrel: you believe that evil is bound to win, since the moral is
the impotent, the impractical.

“Morality, to you, is a phantom scarecrow made of duty, of boredom, of
punishment, of pain, a cross-breed between the first schoolteacher of
your past and the tax collector of your present, a scarecrow standing
in a barren field, waving a stick to chase away your pleasures-and
pleasure, to you, is a liquor-soggy brain, a mindless slut, the stupor
of a moron who stakes his cash on some animal’s race, since pleasure
cannot be moral.

“If you identify your actual belief, you will find a triple
damnation-of yourself, of life, of virtue-in the grotesque conclusion
you have reached: you believe that morality is a necessary evil.

“Do you wonder why you live without dignity, love without fire and die
without resistance?  Do you wonder why, wherever you look, you see
nothing but unanswerable questions, why your life is tom by impossible
conflicts, why you spend it straddling irrational fences to evade
artificial choices, such as soul or body, mind or heart, security or
freedom, private profit or public good?

“Do you cry that you find no answers?  By what means did you hope to
find them?  You reject your tool of perception-your mind-then complain
that the universe is a mystery.  You discard your key, then wail that
all doors are locked against you.  You start out in pursuit of the
irrational, then damn existence for making no sense.

“The fence you have been straddling for two hours-while hearing my
words and seeking to escape them-is the coward’s formula contained in
the sentence: ‘But we don’t have to go to extremes!’ The extreme you
have always struggled to avoid is the recognition that reality is
final, that A is A and that the truth is true.  A moral code
impossible to practice, a code that demands imperfection or death, has
taught you to dissolve all ideas in fog, to permit no firm
definitions, to regard any concept as approximate and any rule of
conduct as elastic, to hedge on any principle, to compromise on any
value, to take the middle of any road.  By extorting your acceptance
of supernatural absolutes, it has forced you to reject the absolute of
nature.  By making moral judgments impossible, it has made you
incapable of rational judgment.  A code that forbids you to cast the
first stone, has forbidden you to admit the identity of stones and to
know when or if you’re being stoned.

“The man who refuses to judge, who neither agrees nor disagrees, who
declares that there are no absolutes and believes that he escapes
responsibility, is the man responsible for all the blood that is now
spilled in the world.  Reality is an absolute, existence is an
absolute, a speck of dust is an absolute and so is a human life.
Whether you live or die is an absolute.  Whether you have a piece of
bread or not, is an absolute.  Whether you eat your break or see it
vanish into a looter’s stomach, is an absolute.

“There are two sides to every issue: one side is right and the other
is wrong, but the middle is always evil.  The man who is wrong still
retains some respect for truth, if only by accepting the
responsibility of choice.  But the man in the middle is the knave who
blanks out the truth in order to pretend that no choice or values
exist, who is willing to sit out the course of any battle, willing to
cash in on the blood of the innocent or to crawl on his belly to the
guilty, who dispenses justice by condemning both the robber and the
robbed to jail, who shoves conflicts by ordering the thinker and the
fool to meet each other halfway.  In any compromise between food and
poison, it is only death that can win.  In any compromise between good
and evil, it is only evil that can profit.  In that transfusion of
blood which drains the good to feed the evil, the compromiser is the
transmitting rubber tube.

“You, who are half-rational, half-coward, have been playing a con game
with reality, but the victim you have conned is yourself.  When men
reduce their virtues to the approximate, then evil acquires the force
of an absolute, when loyalty to an unyielding purpose is dropped by
the virtuous, it’s picked up by scoundrels-and you get the indecent
spectacle of a cringing, bargaining, traitorous good and a
self-righteously uncompromising evil.  As you surrendered to the
mystics of muscle when they told you that ignorance consists of
claiming knowledge, so now you surrender to them when they shriek that
immorality consists of pronouncing moral judgment.  When they yell
that it is selfish to be certain that you are right, you hasten to
assure them that you’re certain of nothing.  When they shout that it’s
immoral to stand on your convictions, you assure them that you have no
convictions whatever.  When the thugs of Europe’s People’s States
snarl that you are guilty of intolerance, because you don’t treat your
desire to live and their desire to kill you as a difference of
opinion-you cringe and hasten to assure them that you are not
intolerant of any horror.  When some barefoot bum in some pesthole of
Asia yells at you: How dare you be rich-you apologize and beg him to
be patient and promise him you’ll give it all away.

“You have reached the blind alley of the treason you committed when
you agreed that you had no right to exist.  Once, you believed it was
‘only a compromise’: you conceded it was evil to live for yourself,
but moral to live for the sake of your children.  Then you conceded
that it was selfish to live for your children, but moral to live for
your community.  Then you conceded that it was selfish to live for
your community, but moral to live for your country.  Now, you are
letting this greatest of countries be devoured by any scum from any
corner of the earth, while you concede that it is selfish to live for
your country and that your moral duty is to live for the globe.  A man
who has no right to life, has no right to values and will not keep
them.

“At the end of your road of successive betrayals, stripped of weapons,
of certainty, of honor, you commit your final act of treason and sign
your petition of intellectual bankruptcy: while the muscle-mystics of
the People’s States proclaim that they’re the champions of reason and
science, you agree and hasten to proclaim that faith is your cardinal
principle, that reason is on the side of your destroyers, but yours is
the side of faith.  To the struggling remnants of rational honesty in
the twisted, bewildered minds of your children, you declare that you
can offer no rational argument to support the ideas that created this
country, that there is no rational justification for freedom, for
property, for justice, for rights, that they rest on a mystical
insight and can be accepted only on faith, that in reason and logic
the enemy is right, but faith is superior to reason.  You declare to
your children that it is rational to loot, to torture, to enslave, to
expropriate, to murder, but that they must resist the temptations of
logic and stick to the discipline of remaining irrational-that
skyscrapers, factories, radios, airplanes were the products of faith
and mystic intuition, while famines, concentration camps, and firing
squads are the products of a reasonable manner of existence-that the
industrial revolution was the revolt of the men of faith against that
era of reason and logic which is known as the Middle Ages.
Simultaneously, in the same breath, to the same child, you declare
that the looters who rule the People’s States will surpass this
country in material production, since they are the representatives of
science, but that it’s evil to be concerned with physical wealth and
that one must renounce material prosperity-you declare that the
looters’ ideal are noble, but they do not mean them, while you do;
that your purpose in fighting the looters is only to accomplish their
aims, which they cannot accomplish, but you can; and that the way to
fight them is to beat them to it and give one’s wealth away.  Then you
wonder why your children join the People’s thugs or become half-crazed
delinquents, you wonder why the looters’ conquests keep creeping
closer to your doors-and you blame it on human stupidity, declaring
that the masses are impervious to reason.

“You blank out the open, public spectacle of the looters’ fight
against the mind, and the fact that their bloodiest horrors are
unleashed to punish the crime of thinking.  You blank out the fact
that most mystics of muscle started out as mystics of spirit, that
they keep switching from one to the other, that the men you call
materialists and spiritualists are only two halves of the same
dissected human, forever seeking completion, but seeking it by
swinging from the destruction of the flesh to the destruction of the
soul and vice versa-that they keep running from your colleges to the
slave pens of Europe to an open collapse into the mystic muck of
India, seeking any refuge against reality, any form of escape from the
mind.

“You blank it out and cling to your hypocrisy of ‘faith’ in order to
blank out the knowledge that the looters have a stranglehold upon you,
which consists of your moral code-that the looters are the final and
consistent practitioners of the morality you’re half-obeying,
half-evading-that they practice it the only way it can be practiced:
by turning the earth into a sacrificial furnace-that your morality
forbids you to oppose them in the only way they can be opposed: by
refusing to become a sacrificial animal and proudly asserting your
right to exist-that in order to fight them to the finish and with full
rectitude, it is your morality that you have to reject.

“You blank’ it out, because your self-esteem is tied to ‘that mystic
‘unselfishness’ which you’ve never possessed or practiced, but spent
so many years pretending to possess that the thought of denouncing it
fills you with terror.  No value is higher than self-esteem, but
you’ve invested it in counterfeit securities-and now your morality has
caught you in a trap where you are forced to protect your self-esteem
by fighting for the creed of self-destruction.  The grim joke is on
you: that need of self-esteem, which you’re unable to explain or to
define, belongs to my morality, not yours; it’s the objective token of
my code, it is my proof within your own soul.

“By a feeling he has not learned to identify, but has derived from his
first awareness of existence, from his discovery that he has to make
choices, man knows that his desperate need of self-esteem is a matter
of life or death.  As a being of volitional consciousness, he knows
that he must know his own value in order to maintain his own life.  He
knows that he has to be right; to be wrong in action means danger to
his life; to be wrong in person, to be evil, means to be unfit for
existence.

“Every act of man’s life has to be willed; the mere act of obtaining
or eating his food implies that the person he preserves is worthy of
being preserved; every pleasure he seeks to enjoy implies that the
person who seeks it is worthy of finding enjoyment.  He has no choice
about his need of self-esteem, his only choice is the standard by
which to gauge it.  And he makes his fatal error when he switches this
gauge protecting his life into the service of his own destruction,
when he chooses a standard contradicting existence and sets his
self-esteem against reality.

“Every form of causeless self-doubt, every feeling of inferiority and
secret unworthiness is, in fact, man’s hidden dread of his inability
to deal with existence.  But the greater his terror, the more fiercely
he clings to the murderous doctrines that choke him.  No man can
survive the moment of pronouncing himself irredeemably evil; should he
do it, his next moment is insanity or suicide.  To escape it-if he’s
chosen an irrational Standard-he will fake, evade, blank out; he will
cheat himself of reality, of existence, of happiness, of mind; and he
will ultimately cheat himself of self-esteem by struggling to preserve
its illusion rather than to risk discovering its lack.  To fear to
face an issue is to believe that the worst is true.

“It is not any crime you have committed that infects your soul with
permanent guilt, it is none of your failures, errors or flaws, but
theblank-out by which you attempt to evade them-it is not any sort of
Original Sin or unknown prenatal deficiency, but the knowledge and
fact of your basic default, of suspending your mind, of refusing to
think.  Fear and guilt are your chronic emotions, they are real and
you do deserve them, but they don’t come from the superficial reasons
you invent to disguise their cause, not from your ‘selfishness,’
weakness or ignorance, but from a real and basic threat to your
existence; fear, because you have abandoned your weapon of survival,
guilt, because you know you have done it volitionally.

“The self you have betrayed is your mind; self-esteem is reliance on
one’s power to think.  The ego you seek, that essential ‘you’ which
you cannot express or define, is not your emotions or inarticulate
dreams, but your intellect, that judge of your supreme tribunal whom
you’ve impeached in order to drift at the mercy of any stray shyster
you describe as your ‘feeling.’ Then you drag yourself through a
self-made night, in a desperate quest for a nameless fire, moved by
some fading vision of a dawn you had seen and lost.

“Observe the persistence, in mankind’s mythologies, of the legend
about a paradise that men had once possessed, the city of Atlantis or
the Garden of Eden or some kingdom of perfection, always behind us.
The root of that legend exists, not in the past of the race, but in
the past of every man.  You still retain a sense-not as firm as a
memory, but diffused like the pain of hopeless longing-that somewhere
in the starting years of your childhood, before you had learned to
submit, to absorb the terror of unreason and to doubt the value of
your mind, you had known a radiant state of existence, you had known
the independence of a rational consciousness facing an open universe.
That is the paradise which you have lost, which you seek-which is
yours for the taking.

“Some of you will never know who is John Galt.  But those of you who
have known a single moment of love for existence and of pride in being
its worthy lover, a moment of looking at this earth and letting your
glance be its sanction, have known the state of being a man, and I-I
am only the man who knew that that state is not to be betrayed.  I am
the man who knew what made it possible and who chose consistently to
practice and to be what you had practiced and been in that one moment.

“That choice is yours to make.  That choice-the dedication to one’s
highest potential-is made by accepting the fact that the noblest act
you have ever performed is the act of your mind in the process of
grasping that two and two make four.

“Whoever you are-you who are alone with my words in this moment, with
nothing but your honesty to help you understand-the choice is still
open to be a human being, but the price is to start from scratch, to
stand naked in the face of reality and, reversing a costly historical
error, to declare: ‘I am, therefore I’ll think.’

“Accept the irrevocable fact that your life depends upon your mind.
Admit that the whole of your struggle, your doubts, your fakes, your
evasions, was a desperate quest for escape from the responsibility of
a volitional consciousness-a quest for automatic knowledge, for
instinctive action, for intuitive certainty-and while you called it a
longing for the state of an angel, what you were seeking was the state
of an animal.  Accept, as your moral ideal, the task of becoming a
man.

“Do not say that you’re afraid to trust your mind because you know so
little.  Are you safer in surrendering to mystics and discarding the
little that you know?  Live and act within the limit of your knowledge
and keep expanding it to the limit of your life.  Redeem your mind
from the hockshops of authority.  Accept the fact that you are not
omniscient, but playing a zombie will not give you omniscience-that
your mind is fallible, but becoming mindless will not make you
infallible-that an error made on your own is safer than ten truths
accepted on faith, because the first leaves you the means to correct
it, but the second destroys your capacity to distinguish truth from
error.  In place of your dream of an omniscient automation, accept the
fact that any knowledge man acquires is acquired by his own will and
effort, and that that is his distinction in the universe, that is his
nature, his morality, his glory.

“Discard that unlimited license to evil which consists of claiming
that man is imperfect.  By what standard do you damn him when you
claim it?  Accept the fact that in the realm of morality nothing less
than perfection will do.  But perfection is not to be gauged by mystic
commandments to practice the impossible, and your moral stature is not
to be gauged by matters not open to your choice.  Man has a single
basic choice: to think or not, and that is the gauge of his virtue.
Moral perfection is an unbreached rationality-not the degree of your
intelligence, but the full and relentless use of your mind, not the
extent of your knowledge, but the acceptance of reason as an absolute.

“Learn to distinguish the difference between errors of knowledge and
breaches of morality.  An error of knowledge is not a moral flaw,
provided you are willing to correct it; only a mystic would judge
human beings by the standard of an impossible, automatic omniscience.
But a breach of morality is the conscious choice of an action you know
to be evil, or a willful evasion of knowledge, a suspension of sight
and of thought.  That which you do not know, is not a moral charge
against you; but that which you refuse to know, is an account of
infamy growing in your soul.  Make every allowance for errors of
knowledge; do not forgive or accept any breach of morality.  Give the
benefit of the doubt to those who seek to know; but treat as potential
killers those specimens of insolent depravity who make demands upon
you, announcing that they have and seek no reasons, proclaiming, as a
license, that they ‘just feel it’-or those who reject an irrefutable
argument by saying: ‘It’s only logic,’ which means: ‘It’s only
reality.’ The only realm opposed to reality is the realm and premise
of death.

“Accept the fact that the achievement of your happiness is the only
moral purpose of your life, and that happiness-not pain or mindless
self-indulgence-is the proof of your moral integrity, since it is the
proof and the result of your loyalty to the achievement of your
values.  Happiness was the responsibility you dreaded, it required the
kind of rational discipline you did not value yourself enough to
assume-and the anxious staleness of your day is the monument to your
evasion of the knowledge that there is no moral substitute for
happiness, that there is no more despicable coward than the man who
deserted the battle for his joy, fearing to assert his right to
existence, lacking the courage and the loyalty to life of a bird or a
flower reaching for the sun.  Discard the protective rags of that vice
which you called a virtue: humility-learn to value yourself, which
means: to fight for your happiness-and when you learn that pride is
the sum of all virtues, you will learn to live like a man.

“As a basic step of self-esteem, learn to treat as the mark of a
cannibal any man’s demand for your help.  To demand it is to claim
that your life is his property-and loathsome as such claim might be,
there’s something still more loathsome: your agreement.  Do you ask if
it’s ever proper to help another man?  No-if he claims it as his right
or as a moral duty that you owe him.  Yes-if such is your own desire
based on your own selfish pleasure in the value of his person and his
struggle.  Suffering as such is not a value; only man’s fight against
suffering, is.  If you choose to help a man who suffers, do it only on
the ground of his virtues, of his right to recover, of his rational
record, or of the fact that he suffers unjustly; then your action is
still a trade, and his virtue is the payment for your help.  Be to
help a man who has no virtues, to help him on the ground of his
suffering as such, to accept his faults, his need, as a claim-is to
accept the mortgage of a zero on your values.  A man who has no
virtues is a hater of existence who acts on the premise of death; to
help him is to sanction his evil and to support his career of
destruction.  Be it only a penny you will not miss or a kindly smile
he has not earned, a tribute to a zero is treason to life and to all
those who struggle to maintain it.  It is of such pennies and smiles
that the desolation of your world was made.

“Do not say that my morality is too hard for you to practice and that
you fear it as you fear the unknown.  Whatever living moments you have
known, were lived by the values of my code.  But you stifled, negated,
betrayed it.  You kept sacrificing your virtues to your vices, and the
best among men to the worst.  Look around you: what you have done to
society, you have done it first within your soul; one is the image of
the other.  This dismal wreckage, which is now your world, is the
physical form of the treason you committed to your values, to your
friends, to your defenders, to your future, to your country, to
yourself.

“We-whom you are now calling, but who will not answer any longer-we
have lived among you, but you failed to know us, you refused to think
and to see what we were.  You failed to recognize the motor I
invented-and it became, in your world, a pile of dead scrap.  You
failed to recognize the hero in your soul-and you failed to know me
when I passed you in the street.  When you cried in despair for the
unattainable spirit which you felt had deserted your world, you gave
it my name, but what you were calling was your own betrayed
self-esteem.  You will not recover one without the other.

“When you failed to give recognition to man’s mind and attempted to
rule human beings by force-those who submitted had no mind to
surrender; those who had, were men who don’t submit.  Thus the man of
productive genius assumed in your world the disguise of a playboy and
became a destroyer of wealth, choosing to annihilate his fortune
rather than surrender it to guns.  Thus the thinker, the man of
reason, assumed in your world the role of a pirate, to defend his
values by force against your force, rather than submit to the rule of
brutality.  Do you hear me, Francisco d’Anconia and Ragnar
Danneskjöld, my first friends, my fellow fighters, my fellow outcasts,
in whose name and honor I speak?

“It was the three of us who started what I am now completing.  It was
the three of us who resolved to avenge this country and to release its
imprisoned soul.  This greatest of countries was built on my
morality-on the inviolate supremacy of man’s right to exist-but you
dreaded to admit it and live up to it.  You stared at an achievement
unequaled in history, and looted its effects and blanked out its
cause.  In the presence of that monument to human morality, which is a
factory, a highway or a bridge-you kept damning this country as
immoral and its progress as ‘material greed,’ you kept offering
apologies for this country’s greatness to the idol of primordial
starvation, to decaying Europe’s idol of a leprous, mystic bum.

“This country-the product of reason-could not survive on the morality
of sacrifice.  It was not built by men who sought self-immolation or
by men who sought handouts.  It could not stand on the mystic split
that divorced man’s soul from his body.  It could not live by the
mystic doctrine that damned this earth as evil and those who succeeded
on earth as depraved.  From its start, this country was a threat to
the ancient rule of mystics.  In the brilliant rocket-explosion of its
youth, this country displayed to an incredulous world what greatness
was possible to man, what happiness was possible on earth.  It was one
or the other: America or mystics.  The mystics knew it; you didn’t.
You let them infect you with the worship of need-and this country
became a giant in body with a mooching midget in place of its soul,
while its living soul was driven underground to labor and feed you in
silence, unnamed, unhonored, negated, its soul and hero: the
industrialist.  Do you hear me now, Hank Rearden, the greatest of the
victims I have avenged?

“Neither he nor the rest of us will return until the road is clear to
rebuild this country-until the wreckage of the morality of sacrifice
has been wiped out of our way.  A country’s political system is based
on its code of morality.  We will rebuild America’s system on the
moral premise which had been its foundation, but which you treated as
a guilty underground, in your frantic evasion of the conflict between
that premise and your mystic morality: the premise that man is an end
in himself, not the means to the ends of others, that man’s life, his
freedom, his happiness are his by inalienable right.

“You who’ve lost the concept of a right, you who swing in impotent
evasiveness between the claim that rights are a gift of God, a
supernatural gift to be taken on faith, or the claim that rights are a
gift of society, to be broken at its arbitrary whim-the source of
man’s rights is not divine law or congressional law, but the law of
identity.  A is A-and Man is Man.  Rights are conditions of existence
required by man’s nature for his proper survival.  If man is to live
on earth, it is right for him to use his mind, his right to act on his
own free judgment, it is right to work for his values and to keep the
product of his work.  If life on earth is his purpose, he has a right
to live as a rational being: nature forbids him the irrational.  Any
group, any gang, any nation that attempts to negate man’s rights, is
wrong, which means: is evil, which means: is anti-life.

“Rights are a moral concept-and morality is a matter of choice.  Men
are free not to choose man’s survival as the standard of their morals
and their laws, but not free to escape from the fact that the
alternative is a cannibal society, which exists for a while by
devouring its best and collapses like a cancerous body, when the
healthy have been eaten by the diseased, when the rational have been
consumed by the irrational.  Such has been the fate of your societies
in history, but you’ve evaded the knowledge of the cause.  I am here
to state it: the agent of retribution was the law of identity, which
you cannot escape.  Just as man cannot live by means of the
irrational, so two men cannot, or two thousand, or two billion.  Just
as man can’t succeed by defying reality, so a nation can’t, or a
country, or a globe.  A is A. The rest is a matter of time, provided
by the generosity of victims.

“Just as man can’t exist without his body, so no rights can exist
without the right to translate one’s rights into reality-to think, to
work and to keep the results-which means: the right of poverty.  The
modern mystics of muscle who offer you the fraudulent alternative of
‘human rights’ versus ‘property rights,’ as if one could exist without
the other, are making a last, grotesque attempt to revive the doctrine
of soul versus body.  Only a ghost can exist without material
property; only a slave can work with no right to the product of his
effort.  The doctrine that ‘human rights’ are superior to ‘property
rights’ simply means that some human beings have the right to make
property out of others; since the competent have nothing to gain from
the incompetent, it means the right of the incompetent to own their
betters and to use them as productive cattle.  Whoever regards this as
human and right, has no right to the title of ‘human.’

“The source of property rights is the law of causality.  All property
and all forms of wealth are produced by man’s mind and labor.  As you
cannot have effects without causes, so you cannot have wealth without
its source: without intelligence.  You cannot force intelligence to
work: those who’re able to think, will not work under compulsion:
those who will, won’t produce much more than the price of the whip
needed to keep them enslaved.  You cannot obtain the products of a
mind except on the owner’s terms, by trade and by volitional consent.
Any other policy of men toward man’s poverty is the policy of
criminals, no matter what their numbers.  Criminals are savages who
play in short-range and starve when their prey runs out-just as you’re
starving today, you who believed that crime could be ‘practical’ if
your government decreed that robbery was legal and resistance to
robbery illegal.

“The only proper purpose of a government is to protect man’s rights,
which means: to protect him from physical violence.  A proper
government is only a policeman, acting as an agent of man’s
self-defense, and, as such, may resort to force only against those who
start the use of force.  The only proper functions of a government
are: the police, to protect you from criminals; the army, to protect
you from foreign invaders; and the courts, to protect your property
and contracts from breach or fraud by others, to settle disputes by
rational rules, according to objective law.  But a government that
initiates the employment of force against men who had forced no one,
the employment of armed compulsion against disarmed victims, is a
nightmare infernal machine designed to annihilate morality: such a
government reverses its only moral purpose and switches from the role
of protector to the role of man’s deadliest enemy, from the role of
policeman to the role of a criminal vested with the right to the
wielding of violence against victims deprived of the right of
self-defense.  Such a government substitutes for morality the
following rule of social conduct: you may do whatever you please to
your neighbor, provided your gang is bigger than his.

“Only a brute, a fool or an evader can agree to exist on such terms or
agree to give his fellow men a blank check on his life and his mind,
to accept the belief that others have the right to dispose of his
person at their whim, that the will of the majority is Omnipotent,
that the physical force of muscles and numbers is a substitute for
justice, reality and truth.  We, the men of the mind, we who are
traders, not masters or slaves, do not deal in blank checks or grant
them.  We do not live or work with any form of the non-objective.

“So long as men, in the era of savagery, had no concept of objective
reality and believed that physical nature was ruled by the whim of
unknowable demons-no thought, no science, no production were possible.
Only when men discovered that nature was a firm, predictable absolute
were they able to rely on their knowledge, to choose their course, to
plan their future and, slowly, to rise from the cave.  Now you have
placed modern industry, with its immense complexity of scientific
precision, back into the power of unknowable demons-the unpredictable
power of the arbitrary whims of hidden, ugly little bureaucrats.  A
farmer will not invest the effort of one summer if he’s unable to
calculate his chances of a harvest.  But you expect industrial
giants-who plan in terms of decades, invest in terms of generations
and undertake ninety-nine-year contracts-to continue to function and
produce, not knowing what random caprice in the skull of what random
official will descend upon them at what moment to demolish the whole
of their effort.  Drifters and physical laborers live and plan by the
range of a day.  The better the mind, the longer the range.  A man
whose vision extends to a shanty, might continue to build on your
quicksands, to grab a fast profit and run.  A man who envisions
skyscrapers, will not.  Nor will he give ten years of unswerving
devotion to the task of inventing a new product, when he knows the
gangs of entrenched mediocrity are juggling the laws against him, to
tie him, restrict him and force him to fail, but should he fight them
and struggle and succeed, they will seize his rewards and his
invention.

“Look past the range of the moment, you who cry that you fear to
compete with men of superior intelligence, that their mind is a threat
to your livelihood, that the strong leave no chance to the weak in a
market of voluntary trade.  What determines the material value of your
work?  Nothing but the productive effort of your mind-if you lived on
a desert island.  The less efficient the thinking of your brain, the
less your physical labor would bring you-and you could spend your life
on a single routine, collecting a precarious harvest or hunting with
bow and arrows, unable to think any further.  But when you live in a
rational society, where men are free to trade, you receive an
incalculable bonus: the material value of your work is determined not
only by your effort, but by the effort of the best productive minds
who exist in the world around you.

“When you work in a modern factory, you are paid, not only for your
labor, but for all the productive genius which has made that factory
possible: for the work of the industrialist who built it, for the work
of the investor who saved the money to risk on the untried and the
new, for the work of the engineer who designed the machines of which
you are pushing the levers, for the work of the inventor who created
the product which you spend your time on making, for the work of the
scientist who discovered the laws that went into the making of that
product, for the work of the philosopher who taught men how to think
and whom your spend your time denouncing.

“The machine, the frozen form of a living intelligence, is the power
that expands the potential of your life by raising the productivity of
your time.  If you worked as a blacksmith in the mystics’ Middle Ages,
the whole of your earning capacity would consist of an iron bar
produced by your hands in days and days of effort.  How many tons of
rail do you produce per day if you work for Hank Rearden?  Would you
dare to claim that the size of your pay cheek was created solely by
your physical labor and that those rails were the product of your
muscles?  The standard of living of that blacksmith is all that your
muscles are worth; the rest is a gift from Hank Rearden.

“Every man is free to rise as far as he’s able or willing, but it’s
only the degree to which he thinks that determines the degree to which
he’ll rise.  Physical labor as such can extend no further than the
range of the moment.  The man who does no more than physical labor,
consumes the material value-equivalent of his own contribution to the
process of production, and leaves no further value, neither for
himself nor others.  But the man who produces an idea in any field of
rational endeavor-the man who discovers new knowledge-is the permanent
benefactor of humanity.  Material products can’t be shared, they
belong to some ultimate consumer; it Is only the value of an idea that
can be shared with unlimited numbers of men, making all sharers richer
at no one’s sacrifice or loss, raising the productive capacity of
whatever labor they perform.  It is the value of his own time that the
strong of the intellect transfers to the weak, letting them work on
the jobs he discovered, while devoting his time to further
discoveries.  This is mutual trade to mutual advantage; the interests
of the mind are one, no matter what the degree of intelligence, among
men who desire to work and don’t seek or expect the unearned.

“In proportion to the mental energy he spent, the man who creates a
new invention receives but a small percentage of his value in terms of
material payment, no matter what fortune he makes, no matter what
millions he earns.  But the man who works as a janitor in the factory
producing that invention, receives an enormous payment in proportion
to the mental effort that his job requires of him.  And the same is
true of all men between, on all levels of ambition and ability.  The
man at the top of the intellectual pyramid contributes the most to all
those below him, but gets nothing except his material payment,
receiving no intellectual bonus from others to add to the value of his
time.  The man at the bottom who, left to himself, would starve in his
hopeless ineptitude, contributes nothing to those above him, but
receives the bonus of all of their brains.  Such is the nature of the
‘competition’ between the strong and the weak of the intellect.  Such
is the pattern of ‘exploitation’ for which you have damned the strong.

“Such was the service we had given you and were glad and willing to
give.  What did we ask in return?  Nothing but freedom.  We required
that you leave us free to function-free to think and to work as we
choose-free to take our own risks and to bear our own losses-free to
earn our own profits and to make our own fortunes-free to gamble on
your rationality, to submit our products to your judgment for the
purpose of a voluntary trade, to rely on the objective value of our
work and on your mind’s ability to see it-free to count on your
intelligence and honesty, and to deal with nothing but your mind.
Such was the price we asked, which you chose to reject as too high.
You decided to call it unfair that we, who had dragged you out of your
hovels and provided you with modern apartments, with radios, movies
and cars, should own our palaces and yachts-you decided that you had a
right to your wages, but we had no right to our profits, that you did
not want us to deal with your mind, but to deal, instead, with your
gun.  Our answer to that, was: ‘May you be damned!’ Our answer came
true.  You are.

“You did not care to compete in terms of intelligence-you are now
competing in terms of brutality.  You did not care to allow rewards to
be won by successful production-you are now running a race in which
rewards are won by successful plunder.  You called it selfish and
cruel that men should trade value for value-you have now established
an unselfish society where they trade extortion for extortion.  Your
system is a legal civil war, where men gang up on one another and
struggle for possession of the law, which they use as a club over
rivals, till another gang wrests it from their clutch and clubs them
with it in their turn, all of them clamoring protestations of service
to an unnamed public’s unspecified good.  You had said that you saw no
difference between economic and political power, between the power of
money and the power of guns-no difference between reward and
punishment, no difference between purchase and plunder, no difference
between pleasure and fear, no difference between life and death.  You
are learning the difference now.

“Some of you might plead the excuse of your ignorance, of a limited
mind and a limited range.  But the damned and the guiltiest among you
are the men who had the capacity to know, yet chose to blank out
reality, the men who were willing to steel their intelligence into
cynical servitude to force: the contemptible breed of those mystics of
science who profess a devotion to some sort of ‘pure knowledge’-the
purity consisting of their claim that such knowledge has no practical
purpose on this earth-who reserve their logic for inanimate matter,
but believe that the subject of dealing with men requires and deserves
no rationality, who scorn money and sell their souls in exchange for a
laboratory supplied by loot.  And since there is no such thing as
‘non-practical knowledge’ or any sort of ‘disinterested’ action, since
they scorn the use of their science for the purpose and profit of
life, they deliver their science to the service of death, to the only
practical purpose it can ever have for looters: to inventing weapons
of coercion and destruction.  They, the intellects who seek escape
from moral values, they are the damned on their earth, theirs is the
guilt beyond forgiveness.  Do you hear me, Dr. Robert Stadler?

“But it is not to him that I wish to speak.  I am speaking to those
among you who have retained some sovereign shred of their soul, unsold
and unstamped: ‘-to the order of others.’ If, in the chaos of the
motives that have made you listen to the radio tonight, there was an
honest, rational desire to learn what is wrong with the world, you are
the man whom I wished to address.  By the rules and terms of my code,
one owes a rational statement to those whom it does concern and who’re
making an effort to know.  Those who’re making an effort to fall to
understand me, are not a concern of mine.

“I am speaking to those who desire to live and to recapture the honor
of their soul.  Now that you know the truth about your world stop
supporting your own destroyers.  The evil of the world is made
possible by nothing but the sanction to give it.  Withdraw your
sanction.  Withdraw your support.  Do not try to live on your enemies’
terms or to win at a game where they’re setting the rules.  Do not
seek the favor of those who enslaved you, do not beg for alms from
those who have robbed you, be it subsidies, loans or jobs, do not join
their team to recoup what they’ve taken by helping them rob your
neighbors.  One cannot hope to maintain one’s life by accepting bribes
to condone one’s destruction.  Do not straggle for profit, success or
security at the price of a lien on your right to exist.  Such a lien
is not to be paid off; the more you pay them, the more they will
demand; the greater the values you seek or achieve, the more
vulnerably helpless you become.  Theirs is a system of white blackmail
devised to bleed you, not by means of your sins, but by means of your
love for existence.

“Do not attempt to rise on the looters’ terms or to climb a ladder
while they’re holding the ropes.  Do not allow their hands to touch
the only power that keeps them in power: your living ambition.  Go on
strike-in the manner I did.  Use your mind and skill in private,
extend your knowledge, develop your ability, but do not share your
achievements with others.  Do not try to produce a fortune, with a
looter riding on your back.  Stay on the lowest rung of their ladder,
earn no more than your barest survival, do not make an extra penny to
support the looters’ state.  Since you’re captive, act as a captive,
do not help them pretend that you’re free.  Be the silent,
incorruptible enemy they dread.  When they force you, obey-but do not
volunteer.  Never volunteer a step in their direction, or a wish, or a
plea, or a purpose.  Do not help a holdup man to claim that he acts as
your friend and benefactor.  Do not help your jailers to pretend that
their jail is your natural state of existence.  Do not help them to
fake reality.  That fake is the only dam holding off their secret
terror, the terror of knowing they’re unfit to exist; remove it and
let them drown; your sanction is their only life belt.

“If you find a chance to vanish into some wilderness out of their
reach, do so, but not to exist as a bandit or to create a gang
competing with their racket; build a productive life of your own with
those who accept your moral code and are willing to struggle for a
human existence.  You have no chance to win on the Morality of Death
or by the code of faith and force; raise a standard to which the
honest will repair: the standard of Life and Reason.

“Act as a rational being and aim at becoming a rallying point for all
those who are starved for a voice of integrity-act on your rational
values, whether alone in the midst of your enemies, or with a few of
your chosen friends, or as the founder of a modest community on the
frontier of mankind’s rebirth.

“When the looters’ state collapses, deprived of the best of its
slaves, when it falls to a level of impotent chaos, like the
mystic-ridden nations of the Orient, and dissolves into starving
robber gangs fighting to rob one another-when the advocates of the
morality of sacrifice perish with their final ideal-then and on that
day we will return.

“We will open the gates of our city to those who deserve to enter, a
city of smokestacks, pipe lines, orchards, markets and inviolate
homes.  We will act as the rallying center for such hidden outposts as
you’ll build.  With the sign of the dollar as our symbol-the sign of
free trade and free minds-we will move to reclaim this country once
more from the impotent savages who never discovered its nature, its
meaning, its splendor.  Those who choose to join us, will join us;
those who don’t, will not have the power to stop us; hordes of savages
have never been an obstacle to men who carried the banner of the mind.

“Then this country will once more become a sanctuary for a vanishing
species: the rational being.  The political system we will build is
contained in a single moral premise: no man may obtain any values from
others by resorting to physical force.  Every man will stand or fall,
live or die by his rational judgment.  If he fails to use it and
falls, he will be his only victim.  If he fears that his judgment is
inadequate, he will not be given a gun to improve it.  If he chooses
to correct his errors in time, he will have the unobstructed example
of his betters, for guidance in learning to think; but an end will be
put to the infamy of paying with one life for the errors of another.

“In that world, you’ll be able to rise in the morning with the spirit
you have known in your childhood: that spirit of eagerness, adventure
and certainty which comes from dealing with a rational universe.  No
child is afraid of nature; it is your fear of men that will vanish,
the fear that has stunted your soul, the fear you acquired in your
early encounters with the incomprehensible, the unpredictable, the
contradictory, the arbitrary, the hidden, the faked, the irrational in
men.  You will live in a world of responsible beings, who will be as
consistent and reliable as facts; the guarantee of their character
will be a system of existence where objective reality is the standard
of the judge.  Your virtues will be given protection, your vices and
weaknesses will not.  Every chance will be open to your good, none
will be provided for your evil.  What you’ll receive from men will not
be alms, or pity, or mercy, or forgiveness of sins, but a single
value: justice.  And when you’ll look at men or at yourself, you will
feel, not disgust, suspicion and guilt, but a single constant:
respect.

“Such is the future you are capable of winning.  It requires a
struggle; so does any human value.  All life is a purposeful struggle,
and your only choice is the choice of a goal.  Do you wish to continue
the battle of your present or do you wish to fight for my world?  Do
you wish to continue a struggle that consists of clinging to
precarious ledges in a sliding descent to the abyss, a struggle where
the hardships you endure are irreversible and the victories you win
bring you closer to destruction?  Or do you wish to undertake a
struggle that consists of rising from ledge to ledge in a steady
ascent to the top, a struggle where the hardships are investments in
your future, and the victories bring you irreversibly closer to the
world of your moral ideal, and should you die without reaching full
sunlight, you will die on a level touched by its rays?  Such is the
choice before you.  Let your mind and your love of existence decide.

“The last of my words will be addressed to those heroes who might
still be hidden in the world, those who are held prisoner, not by
their evasions, but by their virtues and their desperate courage.  My
brothers in spirit, check on your virtues and on the nature of the
enemies you’re serving.  Your destroyers hold you by means of your
endurance, your generosity, your innocence, your love-the endurance
that carries their burdens-the generosity that responds to their cries
of despair-the innocence that is unable to conceive of their evil and
gives them the benefit of every doubt, refusing to condemn them
without understanding and incapable of understanding such motives as
theirs-the love, your love of life, which makes you believe that they
are men and that they love it, too.  But the world of today is the
world they wanted; life is the object of their hatred.  Leave them to
the death they worship.  In the name of your magnificent devotion to
this earth, leave them, don’t exhaust the greatness of your soul on
achieving the triumph of the evil of theirs.  Do you hear me … my
love?

“In the name of the best within you, do not sacrifice this word to
those who are its worst.  In the name of the values that keep you
alive, do not let your vision of man be distorted by the ugly, the
cowardly, the mindless in those who have never achieved his title.  Do
not lose your knowledge that man’s proper estate is an upright
posture, an intransigent mind and a step that travels unlimited roads.
Do not let your fire go out, spark by irreplaceable spark, in the
hopeless swamps of the approximate, the not-quite, the not-yet, the
not-at-all.  Do not let the hero in your soul perish, in lonely
frustration for the life you deserved, but have never been able to
reach.  Check your road and the nature of your battle.  The world you
desired can be won, it exists, it is real, it is possible, it’s yours.

“But to win it requires your total dedication and a total break with
the world of your past, with the doctrine that man is a sacrificial
animal who exists for the pleasure of others.  Fight for the value of
your person.  Fight for the virtue of your pride.  Fight for the
essence of that which is man: for his sovereign rational mind.  Fight
with the radiant certainty and the absolute rectitude of knowing that
yours is the Morality of Life and that yours is the battle for any
achievement, any value, any grandeur, any goodness, any joy that has
ever existed on this earth.

“You will win when you are ready to pronounce the oath I have taken at
the start of my battle-and for those who wish to know the day of my
return, I shall now repeat it to the hearing of the world:

“I swear-by my life and my love of it-that I will never live for the
sake of another man, nor ask another man to live for mine.

